Nevada, session 83, SB397.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 629.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.095 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
Commissioner of Insurance shall develop, prescribe for use and
make available a single, standardized form for use by insurers,
carriers, societies, corporations, health maintenance organizations,
managed care organizations, hospitals, medical facilities and other
facilities that provide health care in obtaining any information
related to the credentials of a provider of health care.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not prohibit the
Commissioner of Insurance from developing, prescribing for use
and making available:
(a) Appropriate variations of the form described in that
subsection for use in different geographical regions of this State.
(b) Addenda or supplements to the form described in that
subsection to address, until such time as a new form may be
developed, prescribed for use and made available, any requirements
newly imposed by the Federal Government, the State or one of its
agencies, or a body that accredits hospitals, medical facilities or
health care plans.
-
*SB397*

– 4 –
3. With respect to the form described in subsection 1, the
Commissioner of Insurance shall:
(a) Hold public hearings to seek input regarding the
development of the form;
(b) Develop the form in consideration of the input received
pursuant to paragraph (a);
(c) Ensure that the form is developed in such a manner as to
accommodate and reflect the different types of credentials
applicable to different classes of providers of health care;
(d) Ensure that the form is developed in such a manner as to
reflect standards of accreditation adopted by national organizations
which accredit hospitals, medical facilities and health care plans;
and
(e) Ensure that the form is developed to be used efficiently and
is developed to be neither unduly long nor unduly voluminous.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 689C.025.
(b) “Corporation” means a corporation operating pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 695B of NRS.
(c) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695C.030.
(d) “Insurer” means:
(1) An insurer that issues policies of individual health
insurance in accordance with chapter 689A of NRS; and
(2) An insurer that issues policies of group health insurance
in accordance with chapter 689B of NRS.
(e) “Managed care organization” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.050.
(f) “Provider of health care” means a provider of health care
who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS [.]
or a naturopathic physician or naturopathic assistant licensed or
certified pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
(g) “Society” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695A.044.
Sec. 2. NRS 629.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.580 1. A person who provides wellness services in
accordance with this section, but who is not licensed, certified or
registered in this State as a provider of health care, is not in
violation of any law based on the unlicensed practice of health care
services or a health care profession unless the person:
(a) Performs surgery or any other procedure which punctures the
skin of any person;
(b) Sets a fracture of any bone of any person;
(c) Prescribes or administers X-ray radiation to any person;
(d) Prescribes or administers a prescription drug or device or a
controlled substance to any person;
-
*SB397*

– 5 –
(e) Recommends to a client that he or she discontinue or in any
manner alter current medical treatment prescribed by a provider of
health care licensed, certified or registered in this State;
(f) Makes a diagnosis of a medical disease of any person;
(g) Performs a manipulation or a chiropractic adjustment of the
articulations of joints or the spine of any person;
(h) Treats a person’s health condition in a manner that
intentionally or recklessly causes that person recognizable and
imminent risk of serious or permanent physical or mental harm;
(i) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises or implies to any
person that he or she is a provider of health care;
(j) Engages in the practice of medicine in violation of chapter
630 or 633 of NRS, the practice of homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine in violation of chapter 630A of NRS, the
practice of naprapathy in violation of chapter 634B of NRS or the
practice of podiatry in violation of chapter 635 of NRS, unless
otherwise expressly authorized by this section;
(k) Performs massage therapy as that term is defined in NRS
640C.060, reflexology as that term is defined in NRS 640C.080 or
structural integration as that term is defined in NRS 640C.085;
(l) Provides mental health services that are exclusive to the
scope of practice of a psychiatrist licensed pursuant to chapter 630
or 633 of NRS, or a psychologist licensed pursuant to chapter 641 of
NRS; or
(m) Engages in the practice of applied behavior analysis in
violation of chapter 641D of NRS.
2. Any person providing wellness services in this State who is
not licensed, certified or registered in this State as a provider of
health care and who is advertising or charging a fee for wellness
services shall, before providing those services, disclose to each
client in a plainly worded written statement:
(a) The person’s name, business address and telephone number;
(b) The fact that he or she is not licensed, certified or registered
as a provider of health care in this State;
(c) The nature of the wellness services to be provided;
(d) The degrees, training, experience, credentials and other
qualifications of the person regarding the wellness services to be
provided; and
(e) A statement in substantially the following form:

It is recommended that before beginning any wellness
plan, you notify your primary care physician or other licensed
providers of health care of your intention to use wellness
services, the nature of the wellness services to be provided
and any wellness plan that may be utilized. It is also
-
*SB397*

– 6 –
recommended that you ask your primary care physician or
other licensed providers of health care about any potential
drug interactions, side effects, risks or conflicts between any
medications or treatments prescribed by your primary care
physician or other licensed providers of health care and the
wellness services you intend to receive.

 A person who provides wellness services shall obtain from each
client a signed copy of the statement required by this subsection,
provide the client with a copy of the signed statement at the time of
service and retain a copy of the signed statement for a period of not
less than 5 years.
3. A written copy of the statement required by subsection 2
must be posted in a prominent place in the treatment location of the
person providing wellness services in at least 12-point font.
Reasonable accommodations must be made for clients who:
(a) Are unable to read;
(b) Are blind or visually impaired;
(c) Have communication impairments; or
(d) Do not read or speak English or any other language in which
the statement is written.
4. Any advertisement for wellness services authorized pursuant
to this section must disclose that the provider of those services is not
licensed, certified or registered as a provider of health care in this
State.
5. A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor. Before a criminal proceeding is commenced
against a person for a violation of a provision of this section, a
notification, educational or mediative approach must be utilized by
the regulatory body enforcing the provisions of this section to bring
the person into compliance with such provisions.
6. This section does not apply to or control:
(a) Any health care practice by a provider of health care
pursuant to the professional practice laws of this State, or prevent
such a health care practice from being performed.
(b) Any health care practice if the practice is exempt from the
professional practice laws of this State, or prevent such a health care
practice from being performed.
(c) A person who provides health care services if the person is
exempt from the professional practice laws of this State, or prevent
the person from performing such a health care service.
(d) A medical assistant, as that term is defined in NRS 630.0129
and 633.075, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, as that term
is defined in NRS 630A.015, [or] a homeopathic assistant, as that
-
*SB397*

– 7 –
term is defined in NRS 630A.035 [.] or a naturopathic assistant, as
that term is defined in section 10 of this act.
7. As used in this section, “wellness services” means healing
arts therapies and practices, and the provision of products, that are
based on the following complementary health treatment approaches
and which are not otherwise prohibited by subsection 1:
(a) Anthroposophy.
(b) Aromatherapy.
(c) Traditional cultural healing practices.
(d) Detoxification practices and therapies.
(e) Energetic healing.
(f) Folk practices.
(g) Gerson therapy and colostrum therapy.
(h) Healing practices using food, dietary supplements, nutrients
and the physical forces of heat, cold, water and light.
(i) Herbology and herbalism.
(j) Reiki.
(k) Mind-body healing practices.
(l) Nondiagnostic iridology.
(m) Noninvasive instrumentalities.
(n) Holistic kinesiology.
Sec. 3. NRS 629.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.600 1. A psychotherapist shall not provide any
conversion therapy to a person who is under 18 years of age
regardless of the willingness of the person or his or her parent or
legal guardian to authorize such therapy.
2. Any violation of subsection 1 is a ground for disciplinary
action by a state board that licenses a psychotherapist as defined in
subsection 3.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Conversion therapy” means any practice or treatment that
seeks to change the sexual orientation or gender identity of a person,
including, without limitation, a practice or treatment that seeks to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce
sexual or romantic attractions or feelings toward persons of the
same gender. The term does not include counseling that:
(1) Provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition; or
(2) Provides acceptance, support and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person’s ability to cope, social support and
identity exploration and development, including, without limitation,
an intervention to prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe
sexual practices that is neutral as to the sexual-orientation of the
person receiving the intervention and does not seek to change the
-
*SB397*

– 8 –
sexual orientation or gender identity of the person receiving the
intervention.
(b) “Psychotherapist” means:
(1) A psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State
pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS;
(2) A homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician,
advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant licensed or certified pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS;
(3) A psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State
pursuant to chapter 633 of NRS;
(4) A psychologist licensed to practice in this State pursuant
to chapter 641 of NRS;
(5) A social worker licensed in this State as an independent
social worker or a clinical social worker pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS;
(6) A registered nurse holding a master’s degree in the field
of psychiatric nursing and licensed to practice professional nursing
in this State pursuant to chapter 632 of NRS;
(7) A marriage and family therapist or clinical professional
counselor licensed in this State pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS; or
(8) A person who provides counseling services as part of his
or her training for any of the professions listed in subparagraphs (1)
to (7), inclusive.
Sec. 4. Chapter 630A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 31, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 5. “Approved school of naturopathic medicine” means a
school or college:
1. Determined by the Board to have an educational program
that meets the standards prescribed by the Council on
Naturopathic Medical Education, or its successor agency; and
2. That offers a course of study that:
(a) Upon successful completion, results in the awarding of the
degree of doctor of naturopathic medicine; and
(b) Is accredited or a candidate for accreditation by an
accrediting agency recognized by:
(1) The United States Secretary of Education as a
specialized accrediting agency for schools of naturopathic
medicine or its successor agency; or
(2) The Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its
successor agency.
Sec. 6. “Dangerous drug” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 454.201.
-
*SB397*

– 9 –
Sec. 7. “Drug” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 453.081.
Sec. 8. “Healing art” means any system, treatment,
diagnosis, prescription or practice for the ascertainment, cure,
relief, palliation, adjustment or correction of any human disease,
ailment, deformity, injury, or unhealthy or abnormal physical or
mental condition for the practice of which long periods of
specialized education and training and a degree of specialized
knowledge of an intellectual as well as physical nature are
required.
Sec. 9. “Natural substance” means a homeopathic,
botanical, nutritional or other supplement that:
1. Does not require a prescription pursuant to federal law
before it is prescribed, dispensed or otherwise furnished to a
patient; and
2. Is prescribed by a naturopathic physician to enhance
health, prevent disease or treat a medical condition diagnosed by
the naturopathic physician.
Sec. 10. “Naturopathic assistant” means a person who:
1. Satisfies the educational requirements prescribed by the
Board;
2. Is qualified to perform naturopathic medical services
under the supervision of a naturopathic physician; and
3. Has been issued a certificate as a naturopathic assistant by
the Board.
Sec. 11. “Naturopathic medicine” means:
1. A system of medicine employing accepted procedures for
diagnosis and treatment of human disorders, including the
prescribing and administering of drugs and using diet and
nutrition, including vitamins, fresh or dried herbs, minerals,
enzymes and tissue concentrates and manual manipulation,
including the physical, chemical and other properties of heat,
light, water and electricity.
2. To perform any of the acts described in subsection 1 by
using equipment that transfers information concerning the
medical condition of the patient electronically, telephonically or by
fiber optics, including, without limitation, through telehealth, as
defined in NRS 629.515 from within or outside this State or the
United States.
Sec. 12. “Naturopathic physician” means a person who:
1. Is a graduate of an approved school of naturopathic
medicine; and
2. Has been issued a license to practice naturopathic
medicine from the Board.
Sec. 13. “Prescription drug” means:
-
*SB397*

– 10 –
1. A controlled substance or dangerous drug that may be
dispensed to an ultimate user only pursuant to a lawful
prescription; and
2. Any other substance or drug substituted for such a
controlled substance or dangerous drug.
Sec. 14. “Specialist” means a naturopathic physician who
has successfully completed approved postdoctoral training, who is
certified by a specialty board of examiners recognized by the
Board and who is certified by the Board to practice a specialty
pursuant to section 27 of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. Every person desiring to practice naturopathic
medicine as a naturopathic physician must, before beginning to
practice, procure from the Board a license authorizing such
practice.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630A.225, a license
may be issued to any person who:
(a) Is of good moral character;
(b) Is a graduate of an approved school of naturopathic
medicine located in the United States or Canada;
(c) Has satisfactorily completed an internship, preceptorship
or fellowship training program in naturopathic medicine approved
by the Board;
(d) Has passed all examinations required by the Board or this
chapter; and
(e) Meets any additional requirements established by the
Board, including, without limitation, requirements established by
regulations adopted by the Board.
Sec. 16. 1. A naturopathic physician may:
(a) Order and perform physical and laboratory examinations
for diagnostic purposes, including, without limitation, phlebotomy,
clinical laboratory tests, orifical examinations and physiological
function tests;
(b) Order diagnostic imaging studies, consistent with
naturopathic training as determined by the Board;
(c) Subject to the provisions of section 18 of this act, where
applicable, dispense, administer, order, prescribe and furnish or
perform the following:
(1) Food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino
acids, minerals, enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical
medicines, homeopathic medicines, hormones, drugs and all
dietary supplements, consistent with the routes of administration
set forth in paragraph (d);
(2) Hot or cold hydrotherapy, naturopathic physical
medicine, electromagnetic energy, colon hydrotherapy and
therapeutic exercise;
-
*SB397*

– 11 –
(3) Devices, including, without limitation, therapeutic
devices, barrier contraception and durable medical equipment;
(4) Immunizations;
(5) Health education and health counseling;
(6) Repair and care for incidental and superficial
lacerations and abrasions;
(7) Removal of foreign bodies located in the superficial
tissues; and
(8) Musculoskeletal manipulation consistent with the
education and training of a naturopathic physician as determined
by the Board; and
(d) Use routes of administration that include, without
limitation, oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal,
transdermal, intradermal, subcutaneous, intravenous and
intramuscular.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations relating to intravenous
routes of administration. The regulations must identify and
exclude nutrients that are not suitable for intravenous
administration.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Dietary supplement” has the meaning ascribed to it in 21
U.S.C. § 321.
(b) “Nutrient” means a substance that provides nourishment
for growth or metabolism and that:
(1) Is manufactured and supplied for intravenous use by a
manufacturer registered with the United States Food and Drug
Administration; or
(2) Compounded by a pharmacy licensed pursuant to
chapter 639 of NRS.
Sec. 17. 1. A naturopathic physician may administer a
natural substance through the means of intramuscular,
intravenous, subcutaneous and intradermal injections.
2. To qualify to administer intravenous therapy in his or her
practice pursuant to this section and section 16 of this act, a
naturopathic physician must submit to the Board an attestation
that he or she has completed training in intravenous therapy
approved by the Board. At a minimum, the training must consist
of 16 hours, at least 8 of which must be at a graduate level from a
school approved by the Board, and must include all of the
following topics relating to intravenous therapy:
(a) Indications;
(b) Contraindications;
(c) Formularies;
(d) Emergency protocols;
(e) Osmolarity calculation;
-
*SB397*

– 12 –
(f) Aseptic techniques; and
(g) Proper documentation.
3. The naturopathic physician shall retain documentation of
his or her training for at least 3 years after the date of the
attestation described in subsection 2.
4. A naturopathic physician who uses injection or
intravenous therapy must have a plan to manage adverse events,
including, without limitation, sensitivity, allergy, overdose or other
unintended reactions.
Sec. 18. 1. Subject to the provisions of subsection 2, where
applicable, a naturopathic physician may dispense a natural
substance, drug or device to a patient for a condition being
diagnosed or treated by the naturopathic physician if:
(a) The naturopathic physician is certified to dispense by the
Board.
(b) The natural substance, drug or device is dispensed and, if
required by federal law, properly labeled with the following
information:
(1) The name, address and telephone number of the
dispensing naturopathic physician and a prescription number or
other method of identifying the prescription;
(2) The date on which the natural substance, drug or device
is dispensed;
(3) The patient’s name; and
(4) The name and strength of the natural substance, drug
or device, directions for proper and appropriate use and any
cautionary statements for the natural substance, drug or device. If
a generic drug is dispensed, the manufacturer’s name must be
included.
(c) The dispensing naturopathic physician enters into the
patient’s medical record the name and strength of the natural
substance, drug or device dispensed, the date on which the natural
substance, drug or device is dispensed and the therapeutic reason.
(d) The dispensing naturopathic physician keeps all
prescription drugs and devices in a secured cabinet or room,
controls access to the cabinet or room by a written procedure and
maintains an ongoing inventory of its contents.
2. A naturopathic physician:
(a) May dispense morphine, any controlled substance listed in
schedule II, III, IV or V which is also a homeopathic preparation,
controlled substances listed in schedule III, IV or V which are not
narcotics and any controlled substance which is newly classified
as schedule II after January 1, 2026, if the naturopathic physician
has registered with the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to NRS
453.226; and
-
*SB397*

– 13 –
(b) Shall not dispense controlled substances except as
authorized by paragraph (a).
3. Except in an emergency, a naturopathic physician who
dispenses a natural substance, drug or device without being
certified to dispense by the Board is subject to the imposition of a
civil penalty by the Board of not less than $100 and not more than
$500 for each transaction and may be prohibited from further
dispensing for a period determined by the Board.
4. Before delivering a natural substance, drug or device to a
patient pursuant to this section, the treating naturopathic
physician shall give the patient or the patient’s legal guardian a
written prescription and must inform the patient or the patient’s
legal guardian that the prescription may be filled by the
prescribing physician or the pharmacy of the patient’s choice. If
the patient chooses to have the medication delivered by the
naturopathic physician, the naturopathic physician must retrieve
the written prescription and place it in a prescription file kept by
the naturopathic physician.
5. A naturopathic physician shall provide supervision to a
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or attendant involved in
the dispensing process. For the purposes of this subsection,
“supervision” means that the naturopathic physician is available
in person or by telephone.
6. This section does not prohibit a registered nurse or
licensed practical nurse employed by a naturopathic physician
from assisting in the delivery of natural substances, drugs and
devices in accordance with this chapter.
7. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
dispensing of a natural substance, drug or device, including
regulations prescribing:
(a) The procedure to become certified by the Board to engage
in such dispensing; and
(b) Requirements governing the labeling, recordkeeping,
storage and packaging of natural substances, drugs and devices
that are consistent with the requirements of chapters 453 and 454
of NRS.
8. As used in this section, “dispense” means to deliver a
natural substance, drug or device to an ultimate user, patient or
subject of research by or pursuant to the lawful order of a
naturopathic physician, including the prescribing by a
naturopathic physician, administering, packaging, labeling or
compounding necessary to prepare the natural substance, drug or
device for that delivery.
Sec. 19. 1. An applicant for a license to practice
naturopathic medicine must pass:
-
*SB397*

– 14 –
(a) The Naturopathic Physicians Licensing Examination or its
successor administered by the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners; and
(b) A practical examination approved by the Board with a
grade of at least 75 percent, unless a higher standard is required
for passing the examination, that tests the applicant’s knowledge
and understanding of:
(1) The laws and regulations of this State relating to the
health and safety of the public in the practice of naturopathic
medicine; and
(2) Additional subject areas which are not covered by the
examination described in paragraph (a).
2. The Board may establish by regulation:
(a) The additional subject areas to be included in the practical
examination; and
(b) Specific methods for the administration of the practical
examination.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the Board
shall offer the practical examination at least twice each year at the
time and place established by the Board.
4. The Board may cancel a scheduled practical examination
if, within 60 days before the examination, the Board has not
received a request to take the examination.
5. A person who fails the practical examination described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may retake the examination as
provided in section 20 of this act.
6. The Board may employ other professional consultants or
examining services in conducting an examination pursuant to this
section.
7. Each member of the Board who is not licensed in any state
to practice any healing art may not participate in preparing,
conducting or grading any examination required by the Board.
Sec. 20. 1. If an applicant for a license to practice
naturopathic medicine fails in a first examination administered by
the Board pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 19
of this act, the applicant may be reexamined after not less than 6
months.
2. If an applicant fails in a second examination, he or she
may not be reexamined within less than 1 year after the date of the
second examination, and before such reexamination he or she
must furnish to the Board proof of further postgraduate study in
naturopathic medicine that:
(a) Was completed after the second examination; and
(b) Is satisfactory to the Board.
-
*SB397*

– 15 –
3. Each applicant who fails an examination and whom the
Board authorizes to be reexamined shall pay for each
reexamination the reexamination fee prescribed by the Board.
Sec. 21. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630A.225,
the Board may issue to an applicant who is a graduate of a
naturopathic medical school from an institution outside of the
United States or Canada a license to practice naturopathic
medicine if the applicant submits to the Board proof that the
applicant:
(a) Is of good moral character;
(b) Is a graduate of an approved school of naturopathic
medicine;
(c) Has completed a program of clinical training;
(d) Has completed a 2-year internship training program or
postgraduate training satisfactory to the Board;
(e) Has passed all examinations required by the Board or this
chapter; and
(f) Meets any additional requirements established by the
Board, including, without limitation, requirements established by
regulations adopted by the Board.
2. In addition to the proofs required by subsection 1, the
Board may take such further evidence and require such further
proof of the professional and moral qualifications of the applicant
as in its discretion may be deemed proper.
3. If the applicant is a diplomate of an approved specialty
board recognized by this Board, the Board may waive the
requirements of paragraph (e) of subsection 1.
Sec. 22. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630A.225,
the Board may issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine by
endorsement to a person who meets the requirements set forth in
this section, including, without limitation, that the person has been
issued a license to practice naturopathic medicine by:
(a) The District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States; or
(b) Another country if that country requires a written
examination that is substantially equivalent to the written
examination required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
section 19 of this act.
2. To qualify for a license pursuant to this section, at the time
the person files an application with the Board:
(a) The license of the applicant to practice naturopathic
medicine in a jurisdiction described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 must be in effect and unrestricted; and
(b) The applicant must:
-
*SB397*

– 16 –
(1) If the applicant was issued a license described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 before January 1, 2015, provide
proof:
(I) Of completion of a course of at least 60 hours in
pharmacotherapeutics; and
(II) That the applicant passed an examination at the
completion of the course;
(2) Within the 3 years immediately preceding the
application, have been continuously and actively engaged in:
(I) The practice of naturopathic medicine as a
naturopathic physician;
(II) An internship, preceptorship or fellowship training
program in naturopathic medicine approved by the Board;
(III) Postgraduate training satisfactory to the Board; or
(IV) The study of naturopathic medicine as a resident at
an approved school of naturopathic medicine;
(3) Not be involved in or have pending any disciplinary
action concerning a license to practice naturopathic medicine in
the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United
States;
(4) Provide information on all the medical malpractice
claims brought against him or her, without regard to when the
claims were filed or how the claims were resolved;
(5) Pass the practical examination required pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 19 of this act; and
(6) Meet all statutory requirements to obtain a license to
practice naturopathic medicine in this State except that the
applicant is not required to meet the requirements set forth in
section 15 or 19 of this act other than passing the practical
examination specified in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section
19 of this act.
3. Any person applying for a license by endorsement
pursuant to this section shall pay in advance to the Board the
application and initial license fee set forth in NRS 630A.330.
4. A license by endorsement may be issued at a meeting of the
Board or between its meetings by the President of the Board. Such
action shall be deemed to be an action of the Board.
Sec. 23. The Board shall not issue or renew a license to
practice naturopathic medicine unless the applicant for issuance
or renewal of the license attests to knowledge of and compliance
with the guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention concerning the prevention of transmission of
infectious agents through safe and appropriate injection practices.
Sec. 24. 1. The Board may issue a certificate as a
naturopathic assistant to an applicant who is qualified under the
-
*SB397*

– 17 –
regulations of the Board and who has completed an educational
program designed to prepare the applicant to perform
naturopathic services under the supervision of a naturopathic
physician.
2. The Board may approve or deny an application for
certification as a naturopathic assistant and shall provide notice to
the applicant of its decision.
3. The Board may adopt regulations regarding the
certification of a naturopathic assistant pursuant to this section,
which may include, without limitation:
(a) The educational and other qualifications of applicants; and
(b) The naturopathic medical services that such a naturopathic
assistant is authorized to perform under the terms of the certificate
if the services are performed:
(1) Under the supervision and control of a naturopathic
physician; and
(2) Within the scope of the license of the supervising
naturopathic physician;
(c) The tasks that the naturopathic assistant may perform,
without supervision, provided that those tasks must not involve
diagnosing or treating the condition of a patient;
(d) The establishment of requirements for the continuing
education of naturopathic assistants; and
(e) The eligibility requirements for a naturopathic physician to
supervise a naturopathic assistant certified pursuant to this
section.
4. If the naturopathic physician who is supervising a
naturopathic assistant certified pursuant to this section withdraws
from supervision, the certificate of the naturopathic assistant is
automatically suspended.
5. A person shall not use the title “naturopathic assistant” or
a related title, abbreviation or other designation while engaged in
providing naturopathic medical services as a naturopathic
assistant in this State unless that person holds a certificate issued
by the Board pursuant to this section.
Sec. 25. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630A.225,
the Board may issue to a qualified applicant a certificate to
participate in a program of clinical training for naturopathic
medicine if the applicant:
(a) Is enrolled in an approved school of naturopathic
medicine; and
(b) Complies with any other requirements prescribed by the
Board.
-
*SB397*

– 18 –
2. The Board may issue a certificate to participate in a
program of clinical training for not more than 1 year, but may
renew the certificate.
3. The Board may adopt regulations regarding the
certification of a student pursuant to this section, which may
include, without limitation:
(a) The naturopathic medical services that such a student is
authorized to perform under the terms of the certificate if the
services are performed:
(1) Under the supervision and control of a naturopathic
physician; and
(2) Within the scope of the license of the supervising
naturopathic physician;
(b) The tasks that the student may perform without
supervision, provided that those tasks must not involve diagnosing
or treating the condition of a patient; and
(c) The eligibility requirements for a naturopathic physician to
supervise a student certified pursuant to this section.
4. If the naturopathic physician who is supervising a student
pursuant to this section withdraws from supervision or if the
student ceases to be enrolled in an approved school of
naturopathic medicine, his or her certificate to participate in a
program of clinical training is automatically suspended.
5. A person shall not use the title “naturopathic medical
student” or a related title, abbreviation or other designation while
engaged in a program of clinical training in this State unless that
person holds a certificate issued by the Board pursuant to this
section.
6. The holder of a certificate issued by the Board pursuant to
this section is subject to the regulatory and disciplinary authority
of the Board to the same extent as a licensed naturopathic
physician, and is subject to discipline for the same grounds as a
licensed naturopathic physician.
Sec. 26. 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 630A.225,
the Board may issue to a qualified applicant a certificate to
participate in a naturopathic medicine internship, preceptorship or
fellowship training program if the applicant:
(a) Is a graduate of an approved school of naturopathic
medicine; and
(b) Complies with any other requirements prescribed by the
Board.
2. The Board may issue a certificate to participate in a
naturopathic medicine internship, preceptorship or fellowship
training program for not more than 1 year, but may renew the
certificate.
-
*SB397*

– 19 –
3. The Board may adopt regulations regarding the
certification of a person pursuant to this section which may
include, without limitation:
(a) The naturopathic medical services that such a person is
authorized to perform under the terms of the certificate if the
services are performed:
(1) Under the supervision and control of a naturopathic
physician; and
(2) Within the scope of the license of the supervising
naturopathic physician;
(b) The tasks that the person may perform without supervision,
provided that those tasks must not involve diagnosing or treating
the condition of a patient; and
(c) The eligibility requirements for a naturopathic physician to
supervise a person certified pursuant to this section.
4. If the naturopathic physician who is supervising a person
certified pursuant to this section withdraws from supervision, the
certificate to participate in an internship, preceptorship or
fellowship training program is automatically suspended.
5. A person certified pursuant to this section must not:
(a) Employ the naturopathic physician who supervises the
person; or
(b) Have any financial interest in the business owned by the
naturopathic physician who supervises the person.
6. A person shall not use the title “naturopathic trainee,”
“naturopathic intern,” “naturopathic preceptee” or “naturopathic
fellow” or a related title, abbreviation or other designation while
engaged in an internship, preceptorship or fellowship training
program in this State unless that person holds a certificate issued
by the Board pursuant to this section.
7. The holder of a certificate issued by the Board pursuant to
this section is subject to the regulatory and disciplinary authority
of the Board to the same extent as a licensed naturopathic
physician, and is subject to discipline for the same grounds as a
licensed naturopathic physician.
Sec. 27. 1. The Board may grant a certificate as a specialist
practitioner of naturopathy to a person who:
(a) Holds a license to practice naturopathic medicine in this
State;
(b) Has successfully completed a postgraduate training
program, approved by the Board, in the specialty; and
(c) Is currently certified in the specialty by an approved
specialty board recognized by the Board.
2. A certificate issued to a naturopathic physician pursuant to
this section must be concurrently renewed, suspended or revoked
-
*SB397*

– 20 –
with the naturopathic physician’s license to practice naturopathic
medicine.
3. The Board may adopt regulations relating to naturopathic
medical specialties, including, without limitation, regulations
establishing additional requirements for naturopathic physicians
who wish to be certified to practice a naturopathic medical
specialty.
Sec. 28. All state and local governmental regulations relative
to the reporting of births and deaths in any matter pertaining to
the public health apply to naturopathic physicians with the same
effect as to physicians of other schools of medicine. Such reports
by naturopathic physicians must be accepted by the officers of the
agency to which they are made.
Sec. 29. The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying licensure:
1. Failure to maintain timely, legible, accurate and complete
medical records relating to the diagnosis, treatment and care of a
patient.
2. Altering the medical records of a patient.
3. Making or filing a report which the homeopathic
physician, naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of
homeopathy, homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant
knows to be false, failing to file a record or report as required by
law or willfully obstructing or inducing another to obstruct such
filing.
4. Failure to make the medical records of a patient available
for inspection and copying as provided in NRS 629.061.
5. Failure to report any person the homeopathic physician,
naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy,
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant knows, or has
reason to know, is in violation of the provisions of this chapter or
any regulation adopted pursuant thereto within 30 days after the
date on which the homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician,
advanced practitioner of homeopathy, homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant knew or had reason to know of the
violation.
Sec. 30. 1. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 2, a
homeopathic physician may, during the provision of neural
therapy or orthomolecular therapy, dispense, administer and
prescribe any drug, including, without limitation, a controlled
substance or dangerous drug, if the administration and dosage of
the drug is medically appropriate and consistent with the current
standards of the practice of homeopathic medicine and any other
standard or regulation adopted by the Board applicable to neural
therapy or orthomolecular therapy, as applicable.
-
*SB397*

– 21 –
2. A homeopathic physician may prescribe, dispense and
administer a controlled substance or dangerous drug for purposes
other than those described in subsection 1 only:
(a) If the controlled substance or dangerous drug is described
in the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States;
(b) In an amount suitable for a single use; and
(c) For the purpose of diluting the controlled substance or
dangerous drug into a homeopathic preparation at a dosage
prescribed in the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United
States.
3. In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection 1
or 2, as applicable, a homeopathic physician who prescribes,
dispenses or administers a controlled substance must be registered
with the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to NRS 453.226.
4. A homeopathic physician shall not dispense, administer or
prescribe a controlled substance that is a narcotic drug or opiate
which is listed in schedule II for control by the State Board of
Pharmacy pursuant to NRS 453.146, unless the controlled
substance is described in the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia
of the United States and used in a manner and at a dosage
authorized by that publication.
5. The Board shall adopt regulations regarding the
dispensing, administration and prescribing of drugs pursuant to
this section that are consistent with the requirements of chapters
453 and 454 of NRS.
Sec. 31. 1. Upon diagnosing a patient as having an opioid
use disorder, a naturopathic physician shall counsel and provide
information to the patient concerning evidence-based treatment
for opioid use disorders, including, without limitation, medication-
assisted treatment.
2. If the patient requests medication-assisted treatment, the
naturopathic physician shall refer the patient to a physician,
osteopathic physician, physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, advanced practice registered nurse or
pharmacist who is authorized to prescribe an appropriate
medication.
3. As used in this section, “medication-assisted treatment”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 639.28079.
Sec. 32. NRS 630A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 630A.015 to
630A.075, inclusive, and sections 5 to 14, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB397*

– 22 –
Sec. 33. NRS 630A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.020 “Board” means the Nevada Board of Homeopathic
and Naturopathic Medical Examiners.
Sec. 34. NRS 630A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.030 “Gross malpractice” means malpractice where the
failure to exercise the requisite degree of care, diligence or skill
consists of:
1. Ministering to a patient while the homeopathic physician,
naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant is under the
influence of alcohol or any controlled substance.
2. Gross negligence.
3. Willful disregard of homeopathic medical procedures [.] or
naturopathic procedures, as applicable.
4. Willful and consistent use of homeopathic medical
procedures, services or treatment or naturopathic procedures,
services or treatment considered by homeopathic physicians or
naturopathic physicians, as applicable, in the community to be
inappropriate or unnecessary in the cases where used.
Sec. 35. NRS 630A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.040 “Homeopathic medicine” or “homeopathy” means a
system of medicine employing substances of animal, vegetable,
chemical or mineral origin, including:
1. Nosodes and sarcodes, which are:
(a) Given in micro-dosage, except that sarcodes may be given in
macro-dosage;
(b) Prepared according to homeopathic pharmacology by which
the formulation of homeopathic preparations is accomplished by the
methods of Hahnemannian dilution and succussion or magnetically
energized geometric patterns applicable in potencies above 30X, as
defined in the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United
States; and
(c) Prescribed by homeopathic physicians or advanced
practitioners of homeopathy according to the medicines and dosages
in the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States,
 in accordance with the principle that a substance which produces
symptoms in a healthy person can eliminate those symptoms in an
ill person.
2. Noninvasive electrodiagnosis, cell therapy, neural therapy,
herbal therapy, neuromuscular integration, orthomolecular therapy
and nutrition.
3. The administration and prescribing of drugs in the course
of performing neural therapy and orthomolecular therapy, in
accordance with the requirements of section 30 of this act.
-
*SB397*

– 23 –
Sec. 36. NRS 630A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.060 “Malpractice” means failure on the part of a
homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician, advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant to exercise the degree of care, diligence and
skill ordinarily exercised by homeopathic physicians, naturopathic
physicians, advanced practitioners of homeopathy , [or]
homeopathic assistants [,] or naturopathic assistants, respectively,
in good standing in the community in which he or she practices. As
used in this section, “community” embraces the entire area
customarily served by homeopathic physicians, naturopathic
physicians, advanced practitioners of homeopathy , [and]
homeopathic assistants and naturopathic assistants among whom a
patient may reasonably choose, not merely the particular area
inhabited by the patients of that individual homeopathic physician,
naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant or the particular
city or place where the homeopathic physician, naturopathic
physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant has an office.
Sec. 37. NRS 630A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.070 “Professional incompetence” means lack of ability
safely and skillfully to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or one or more specified branches of
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine as a homeopathic
physician [,] or naturopathic physician, as applicable, or to
practice as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as] a
homeopathic assistant [,] or as a naturopathic assistant, as
applicable, arising from:
1. Lack of knowledge or training.
2. Impaired physical or mental capability of the homeopathic
physician, naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant [.] or naturopathic
assistant.
3. Indulgence in the use of alcohol or any controlled substance.
4. Any other sole or contributing cause.
Sec. 38. NRS 630A.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.080 The purpose of licensing homeopathic physicians
and naturopathic physicians and certifying advanced practitioners
of homeopathy , [and] homeopathic assistants and naturopathic
assistants is to protect the public health and safety and the general
welfare of the people of this State. Any license or certificate issued
pursuant to this chapter is a revocable privilege and no holder of
such a license or certificate acquires thereby any vested right.
-
*SB397*

– 24 –
Sec. 39. NRS 630A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.090 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) The practice of dentistry, chiropractic, naprapathy, Oriental
medicine, podiatry, optometry, perfusion, respiratory care, faith or
Christian Science healing, nursing, veterinary medicine or fitting
hearing aids.
(b) A medical officer of the Armed Forces or a medical officer
of any division or department of the United States in the discharge
of his or her official duties, including, without limitation, providing
medical care in a hospital in accordance with an agreement entered
into pursuant to NRS 449.2455.
(c) Licensed or certified nurses in the discharge of their duties as
nurses.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in section 25 of this act, the
practice of naturopathic medicine by a student who is enrolled in
an approved school of naturopathic medicine if the performance
of services is pursuant to a course of instruction and under the
supervision of a naturopathic physician.
(e) Homeopathic physicians or naturopathic physicians who
are called into this State, other than on a regular basis, for
consultation or assistance to any physician licensed in this State, and
who are legally qualified to practice in the state or country where
they reside.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any statute of Nevada
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services of a person in case of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
(c) A person who is engaged in the sale of vitamins or herbs
from providing information about those products.
(d) A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized
pursuant to the laws of this State from performing services within
his or her authorized scope of practice, including, without
limitation, rendering advice concerning:
(1) Diet and nutrition;
(2) Nonprescription products; and
(3) Vitamins, minerals, herbs, natural food products and
their extracts and nutritional supplements.
4. This chapter does not authorize [a] :
(a) A homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician to
practice medicine, including allopathic medicine, except as
otherwise provided in NRS 630A.040 [.] or section 11 of this act.
(b) A homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician to
represent himself or herself as being licensed or certified by any
-
*SB397*

– 25 –
other licensing board in this State unless the person holds a
license or certificate issued by that board.
Sec. 40. NRS 630A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.100 The Nevada Board of Homeopathic and
Naturopathic Medical Examiners consists of [six] eight members
appointed by the Governor. After the initial terms, the term of office
of each member is 4 years.
Sec. 41. NRS 630A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.110 1. Two members of the Board must be persons
who are licensed to practice allopathic or osteopathic medicine in
any state or country, the District of Columbia or a territory or
possession of the United States, have been engaged in the practice
of homeopathic medicine in this State for a period of more than 2
years preceding their respective appointments, are actually engaged
in the practice of homeopathic medicine in this State and are
residents of this State.
2. Two members of the Board must be persons who are
licensed to practice naturopathic medicine in this State, have been
engaged in the practice of naturopathic medicine in this State for
a period of more than 2 years preceding their respective
appointments, are actually engaged in the practice of naturopathic
medicine in this State and are residents of this State.
3. One member of the Board must be an advanced practitioner
of homeopathy who holds a valid certificate granted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 630A.293.
[3.] 4. One member of the Board must be a person who has
resided in this State for at least 3 years and who represents the
interests of persons or agencies that regularly provide health care to
patients who are indigent, uninsured or unable to afford health care.
This member may be licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
[4.] 5. The remaining two members of the Board must be
persons who:
(a) Are not licensed in any state to practice any healing art;
(b) Are not the spouse or the parent or child, by blood, marriage
or adoption, of a person licensed in any state to practice any healing
art;
(c) Are not actively engaged in the administration of any
medical facility or facility for the dependent as defined in chapter
449 of NRS;
(d) Do not have a pecuniary interest in any matter pertaining to
such a facility, except as a patient or potential patient; and
(e) Have resided in this State for at least 3 years.
[5.] 6. The members of the Board must be selected without
regard to their individual political beliefs.
-
*SB397*

– 26 –
[6. As used in this section, “healing art” means any system,
treatment, operation, diagnosis, prescription or practice for the
ascertainment, cure, relief, palliation, adjustment or correction of
any human disease, ailment, deformity, injury, or unhealthy or
abnormal physical or mental condition for the practice of which
long periods of specialized education and training and a degree of
specialized knowledge of an intellectual as well as physical nature
are required.]
Sec. 42. NRS 630A.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.155 The Board shall:
1. Regulate the practice of homeopathic medicine and
naturopathic medicine in this State and any activities that are
within the scope of such practice, to protect the public health and
safety and the general welfare of the people of this State.
2. Determine the qualifications of, and examine, applicants for
licensure or certification pursuant to this chapter, and specify by
regulation the methods to be used to check the background of such
applicants.
3. License or certify those applicants it finds to be qualified.
4. Investigate and, if required, hear and decide in a manner
consistent with the provisions of chapter 622A of NRS all
complaints made against any homeopathic physician, naturopathic
physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy, homeopathic
assistant , naturopathic assistant or any agent or employee of any
of them, or any facility where the primary practice is homeopathic
medicine [.] or naturopathic medicine. If a complaint concerns a
practice which is within the jurisdiction of another licensing board
or any other possible violation of state law, the Board shall refer the
complaint to the other licensing board.
5. Unless the Board determines that extenuating circumstances
exist, forward to the appropriate law enforcement agency any
substantiated information submitted to the Board concerning a
person who practices or offers to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine without the appropriate license or certificate
issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 43. NRS 630A.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.220 1. It is unlawful for any person:
(a) To practice homeopathic medicine [;] or naturopathic
medicine;
(b) To hold himself or herself out as qualified to practice
homeopathic medicine [;] or naturopathic medicine; or
(c) To use in connection with his or her name the words or
letters “H.M.D. [”] ,” “N.M.D.” or any other title, word, letter or
other designation intended to imply or designate the person as a
practitioner of homeopathic medicine [,] or naturopathic medicine,
-
*SB397*

– 27 –
 in this State without first obtaining a license so to do as provided
in this chapter.
2. A physician licensed pursuant to this chapter who holds a
degree such as doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy may
identify himself or herself by that degree or its appropriate
abbreviation, but unless the physician is also licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS must further identify himself or herself
by the words “practitioner of homeopathic medicine” or
“practitioner of naturopathic medicine,” as applicable, or their
equivalent.
Sec. 44. NRS 630A.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.225 1. The Board shall not issue a license to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or a certificate to
practice as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant to an applicant who
has been licensed or certified to practice any type of medicine in
another jurisdiction and whose license or certificate was revoked for
gross medical negligence by that jurisdiction.
2. The Board may revoke the license or certificate of any
person who has been licensed or certified to practice any type of
medicine in another jurisdiction and whose license or certificate was
revoked for gross medical negligence by that jurisdiction.
3. The revocation of a license or certificate to practice any type
of medicine in another jurisdiction on grounds other than grounds
which would constitute gross medical negligence constitutes
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license or certificate.
4. If a license or certificate to practice any type of medicine
issued to an applicant in another jurisdiction has been revoked or
surrendered, the applicant must provide proof satisfactory to the
Board that the applicant is rehabilitated with respect to the conduct
that was the basis for the revocation or surrender of the license or
certificate when submitting an application for a license or certificate
to the Board.
5. The Board shall vacate an order to deny a license or
certificate if the denial is based on a conviction of:
(a) A felony for a violation or offense described in paragraph
(a), (b) or (d) of subsection 2 of NRS 630A.340; or
(b) An offense involving moral turpitude,
 and the conviction is reversed on appeal. An applicant may
resubmit an application for a license or certificate after a court
enters an order reversing the conviction.
6. If the Board finds that an applicant has committed an act or
engaged in conduct that constitutes grounds for initiating
disciplinary action or denying the issuance of a license or certificate
-
*SB397*

– 28 –
as set forth in NRS 630A.340 to 630A.380, inclusive, and section
29 of this act, the Board shall investigate whether the act or conduct
has been corrected or the matter has otherwise been resolved. If the
matter has not been resolved to the satisfaction of the Board, the
Board, before issuing a license or certificate, shall determine to its
satisfaction whether or not mitigating circumstances exist which
prevent the resolution of the matter.
7. For the purposes of this section, the Board shall adopt by
regulation a definition of gross medical negligence.
Sec. 45. NRS 630A.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.246 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter:
(a) An applicant for the issuance of a license [to practice
homeopathic medicine,] or a certificate [as an advanced practitioner
of homeopathy or a certificate as a homeopathic assistant] shall
include the social security number of the applicant in the application
submitted to the Board.
(b) An applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license [to
practice homeopathic medicine,] or a certificate [as an advanced
practitioner of homeopathy or a certificate as a homeopathic
assistant] shall submit to the Board the statement prescribed by the
Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of
Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS 425.520. The
statement must be completed and signed by the applicant.
2. The Board shall include the statement required pursuant to
subsection 1 in:
(a) The application or any other forms that must be submitted
for the issuance or renewal of the license or certificate; or
(b) A separate form prescribed by the Board.
3. A license [to practice homeopathic medicine,] or a
certificate [as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy or a
certificate as a homeopathic assistant] may not be issued or renewed
by the Board if the applicant:
(a) Fails to submit the statement required pursuant to subsection
1; or
(b) Indicates on the statement submitted pursuant to subsection
1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the support of a
child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan approved by
the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the order for
the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the order.
4. If an applicant indicates on the statement submitted pursuant
to subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the
support of a child and is not in compliance with the order or a plan
approved by the district attorney or other public agency enforcing
the order for the repayment of the amount owed pursuant to the
-
*SB397*

– 29 –
order, the Board shall advise the applicant to contact the district
attorney or other public agency enforcing the order to determine the
actions that the applicant may take to satisfy the arrearage.
Sec. 46. NRS 630A.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.260 1. If an applicant for a license to practice
homeopathic medicine fails in a first examination, the applicant
may be reexamined after not less than 6 months.
2. If the applicant fails in a second examination, he or she may
not be reexamined within less than 1 year after the date of the
second examination. Before taking a third examination, the
applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the Board of 1 year of
additional training in homeopathy after the second examination.
3. If an applicant fails three consecutive examinations, he or
she must show the Board by clear and convincing evidence that
extraordinary circumstances justify permitting the applicant to be
reexamined again.
Sec. 47. NRS 630A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.290 1. The Board may deny an application for a license
[to practice homeopathic medicine] or a certificate [to practice as an
advanced practitioner of homeopathy or as a homeopathic assistant]
for any violation of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations
adopted by the Board.
2. The Board shall notify an applicant of any deficiency which
prevents any further action on the application or results in the denial
of the application. The applicant may respond in writing to the
Board concerning any deficiency and, if the applicant does so, the
Board shall respond in writing to the contentions of the applicant.
3. An unsuccessful applicant may appeal to the district court to
review the action of the Board within 30 days after the date of the
rejection of the application by the Board. Upon appeal the applicant
has the burden to show that the action of the Board is erroneous or
unlawful.
4. The Board shall maintain records pertaining to applicants to
whom licenses and certificates have been issued or denied. The
records must be open to the public and must contain:
(a) The name of each applicant.
(b) For an applicant for a license to practice homeopathic
medicine [,] or naturopathic medicine, the name of the school
granting the diploma and the date of the diploma.
(c) The date of issuance or denial of the license or certificate.
(d) The business address of the applicant.
Sec. 48. NRS 630A.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.310 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
630A.225, the Board may:
-
*SB397*

– 30 –
(a) Issue a temporary license, to be effective not more than 6
months after issuance, to any homeopathic physician or
naturopathic physician who is eligible for a permanent license in
this State and who also is of good moral character and reputation.
The purpose of the temporary license is to enable an eligible
homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician to serve as a
substitute for some other homeopathic physician or naturopathic
physician who is licensed to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine in this State , as applicable, and who is
absent from his or her practice for reasons deemed sufficient by the
Board. A temporary license issued under the provisions of this
paragraph is not renewable.
(b) Issue a special license to a licensed homeopathic physician
or naturopathic physician of another state to come into Nevada to
care for or assist in the treatment of his or her own patients in
association with a physician licensed in this State. A special license
issued under the provisions of this paragraph is limited to the care of
a specific patient.
(c) Issue a restricted license for a specified period if the Board
determines the applicant needs supervision or restriction.
2. A person who is licensed pursuant to paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of subsection 1 shall be deemed to have given consent to the
revocation of the license at any time by the Board for any of the
grounds provided in NRS 630A.225 or 630A.340 to 630A.380,
inclusive [.] , and section 29 of this act.
Sec. 49. NRS 630A.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.320 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
630A.225, the Board may issue to a qualified applicant a limited
license to practice homeopathic medicine as a resident homeopathic
physician in a postgraduate program of clinical training if:
(a) The applicant is a graduate of an accredited medical school
in the United States or Canada or is a graduate of a foreign medical
school recognized by the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates and has completed 1 year of supervised clinical
training approved by the Board.
(b) The Board approves the program of clinical training, and the
medical school or other institution sponsoring the program provides
the Board with written confirmation that the applicant has been
appointed to a position in the program.
2. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, an applicant
who is a graduate of a foreign medical school must have received
the standard certificate of the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates.
3. The Board may issue this limited license for not more than 1
year, but may renew the license.
-
*SB397*

– 31 –
4. The holder of this limited license may practice homeopathic
medicine only in connection with his or her duties as a resident
physician and shall not engage in the private practice of
homeopathic medicine.
5. A limited license granted under this section may be revoked
by the Board at any time for any of the grounds set forth in NRS
630A.225 or 630A.340 to 630A.380, inclusive [.] , and section 29
of this act.
Sec. 50. NRS 630A.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.325 1. To renew a license or certificate, other than a
temporary, special or limited license, issued pursuant to this chapter,
each person must, on or before January 1 of each year:
(a) Apply to the Board for renewal;
(b) Pay the annual fee for renewal set by the Board;
(c) Submit, if applicable, a list of all actions filed or claims
submitted to arbitration or mediation for malpractice or
negligence against the holder of the license or certificate during
the immediately preceding year;
(d) Submit evidence to the Board of completion of the
requirements for continuing education; and
[(d)] (e) Submit all information required to complete the
renewal.
2. The Board shall, as a prerequisite for the renewal or
restoration of a license or certificate, other than a temporary, special
or limited license [,] or a certificate issued pursuant to section 25
or 26 of this act require each holder of a license or certificate to
comply with the requirements for continuing education adopted by
the Board.
3. Any holder who fails to pay the annual fee for renewal and
submit all information required to complete the renewal after they
become due must be given a period of 60 days in which to pay the
fee and submit all required information and, failing to do so,
automatically forfeits the right to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or to practice as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy or as a homeopathic assistant [,] or naturopathic
assistant, as applicable, and his or her license to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or certificate to
practice as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy or as a
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant in this State is
automatically suspended. The holder may, within 2 years after the
date his or her license or certificate is suspended, apply for the
restoration of the license or certificate.
4. The Board shall notify any holder whose license or
certificate is automatically suspended pursuant to subsection 3 and
-
*SB397*

– 32 –
send a copy of the notice to the Drug Enforcement Administration
of the United States Department of Justice or its successor agency.
Sec. 51. NRS 630A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.330 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,]
8, each applicant for a license to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine must:
(a) Pay a fee of $800; and
(b) Pay the cost of obtaining such further evidence and proof of
qualifications as the Board may require pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 630A.240 [.] or subsection 2 of section 21 of this act.
2. Each applicant for a certificate to dispense a natural
substance, drug or device as a naturopathic physician pursuant to
section 18 of this act must pay a fee of $100.
3. Each applicant for a certificate as a specialist practitioner
of naturopathy pursuant to section 27 of this act must pay a fee of
$100.
4. Each applicant for a certificate as an advanced practitioner
of homeopathy must:
(a) Pay a fee of $500; and
(b) Pay the cost of obtaining such further evidence and proof of
qualifications as the Board may require pursuant to NRS 630A.295.
[3.] 5. Each applicant for a certificate as a homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant must pay a fee of $300.
[4.] 6. Each applicant for a license or certificate who fails an
examination and who is permitted to be reexamined must pay a fee
not to exceed $600 for each reexamination.
[5.] 7. If an applicant for a license or certificate does not appear
for examination, for any reason deemed sufficient by the Board, the
Board may, upon request, refund a portion of the application fee not
to exceed 50 percent of the fee. There must be no refund of the
application fee if an applicant appears for examination.
[6.] 8. Each applicant for a license or certificate issued under
the provisions of NRS 630A.310 or 630A.320 or section 25 or 26 of
this act must pay a fee not to exceed $400, as determined by the
Board, and must pay a fee of $250 for each renewal of the license [.
7.] or certificate.
9. The fee for the renewal of a license or certificate, as
determined by the Board, must be collected for the year in which a
homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician, advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant is licensed or certified and must not exceed:
(a) For a homeopathic physician [,] or a naturopathic
physician, $2,000 per year.
(b) For an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, $1,500 per
year.
-
*SB397*

– 33 –
(c) For a homeopathic assistant [,] or a naturopathic assistant,
$1,000 per year.
[8.] (d) For a certificate to dispense a natural substance, drug
or device as a naturopathic physician pursuant to section 18 of
this act, $150 per year.
(e) For a certificate as a specialist practitioner of naturopathy
issued pursuant to section 27 of this act, $150 per year.
10. The fee for the restoration of a suspended license or
certificate is twice the amount of the fee for the renewal of a license
or certificate at the time of the restoration of the license or
certificate.
Sec. 52. NRS 630A.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.340 The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license or certificate:
1. Unprofessional conduct.
2. Conviction of:
(a) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS;
(b) A violation of any of the provisions of NRS 616D.200,
616D.220, 616D.240, 616D.300, 616D.310, or 616D.350 to
616D.440, inclusive;
(c) Any offense involving moral turpitude; or
(d) Any offense relating to the practice of homeopathic medicine
or naturopathic medicine or the ability to practice homeopathic
medicine or naturopathic medicine or the practice, or the ability to
practice, as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a]
homeopathic assistant [.] or naturopathic assistant.
 A plea of nolo contendere to any offense listed in this subsection
shall be deemed a conviction.
3. The suspension, modification or limitation of a license or
certificate to practice any type of medicine or to perform any type of
medical services by any other jurisdiction.
4. The surrender of a license or certificate to practice any type
of medicine or to perform any type of medical services or the
discontinuance of the practice of medicine while under investigation
by any licensing or certifying authority, medical facility, facility for
the dependent, branch of the Armed Forces of the United States,
insurance company, agency of the Federal Government or employer.
5. Gross or repeated malpractice, which may be evidenced by
claims of malpractice settled against a homeopathic physician,
naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or]
homeopathic assistant [.] or naturopathic assistant.
6. Professional incompetence.
-
*SB397*

– 34 –
7. Failure of a homeopathic physician to adequately
supervise a homeopathic assistant pursuant to any regulations
adopted by the Board.
8. Failure of a naturopathic physician to adequately
supervise a naturopathic assistant or a participant in a program of
clinical training for naturopathic medicine or a participant in a
naturopathic internship, preceptorship or fellowship training
program pursuant to any regulations adopted by the Board.
Sec. 53. NRS 630A.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.350 The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license or certificate:
1. Willfully making a false or fraudulent statement or
submitting a forged or false document in applying for a license to
practice homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or a
certificate to practice as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy ,
[or as a] homeopathic assistant [.] or naturopathic assistant.
2. Willfully representing with the purpose of obtaining
compensation or other advantages for himself or herself or for any
other person that a manifestly incurable disease or injury or other
manifestly incurable condition can be permanently cured.
3. Obtaining, maintaining or renewing, or attempting to obtain,
maintain or renew, a license to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or a certificate to practice as an advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant by bribery, fraud or misrepresentation or by
any false, misleading, inaccurate or incomplete statement.
4. Advertising the practice of homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or practice as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or naturopathic
assistant in a false, deceptive or misleading manner.
5. Practicing or attempting to practice homeopathic medicine
[,] or naturopathic medicine, or practicing or attempting to practice
as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic
assistant [,] or naturopathic assistant under a name other than the
name under which the person practicing or attempting to practice is
licensed or certified.
6. Signing a blank prescription form.
7. Influencing a patient in order to engage in sexual activity
with the patient or another person.
8. Attempting directly or indirectly, by way of intimidation,
coercion or deception, to obtain or retain a patient or to discourage a
patient from obtaining a second opinion.
-
*SB397*

– 35 –
9. Terminating the medical care of a patient without giving
adequate notice or making other arrangements for the continued care
of the patient.
Sec. 54. NRS 630A.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.360 The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license:
1. Directly or indirectly receiving from any person any fee,
commission, rebate or other form of compensation which tends or is
intended to influence the homeopathic physician’s or naturopathic
physician’s objective evaluation or treatment of a patient.
2. Dividing a fee between homeopathic physicians [,] or
naturopathic physicians, as applicable, unless the patient is
informed of the division of fees and the division is made in
proportion to the services personally performed and the
responsibility assumed by each homeopathic physician [.] or
naturopathic physician, as applicable.
3. Charging for visits to the homeopathic physician’s or
naturopathic physician’s office which did not occur or for services
which were not rendered or documented in the records of the
patient.
4. Employing, directly or indirectly, any suspended or
unlicensed person in the practice of homeopathic medicine [,] or
naturopathic medicine, or the aiding, abetting or assisting of any
unlicensed person to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine contrary to the provisions of this chapter or
the regulations adopted by the Board.
5. Advertising the services of an unlicensed person in the
practice of homeopathic medicine [.] or naturopathic medicine.
6. Delegating responsibility for the care of a patient to a person
whom the homeopathic or naturopathic physician knows, or has
reason to know, is not qualified to undertake that responsibility.
7. Failing to disclose to a patient any financial or other conflict
of interest affecting the care of the patient.
Sec. 55. NRS 630A.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.370 The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license or certificate:
1. Inability to practice homeopathic medicine or naturopathic
medicine or to practice as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy ,
[or as a] homeopathic assistant [,] or naturopathic assistant, as
applicable, with reasonable skill and safety because of an illness, a
mental or physical condition or an alcohol or other substance use
disorder.
2. Engaging in any:
-
*SB397*

– 36 –
(a) Professional conduct which is intended to deceive or which
the Board by regulation has determined is unethical.
(b) Medical practice harmful to the public or any conduct
detrimental to the public health, safety or morals which does not
constitute gross or repeated malpractice or professional
incompetence.
3. Administering, dispensing or prescribing any controlled
substance [,] or dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS
except as authorized by law.
4. Performing, assisting or advising an unlawful abortion or in
the injection of any liquid substance into the human body to cause
an abortion.
5. Performing, assisting or advising in the injection of any
liquid silicone substance into the human body.
6. Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted
by law, or performing services which the homeopathic physician,
naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant knows or has
reason to know he or she is not competent to perform.
[6.] 7. Performing any procedure without first obtaining the
informed consent of the patient or the patient’s family or prescribing
any therapy which by the current standards of the practice of
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine is experimental.
[7.] 8. Continued failure to exercise the skill or diligence or use
the methods ordinarily exercised under the same circumstances by
homeopathic physicians, naturopathic physicians, advanced
practitioners of homeopathy , [and] homeopathic assistants and
naturopathic assistants in good standing who practice homeopathy
and electrodiagnosis [,] or naturopathic medicine, as applicable.
[8.] 9. Operation of a medical facility, as defined in NRS
449.0151, at any time during which:
(a) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
(b) An act or omission occurs which results in the suspension or
revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This subsection applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
[9.] 10. Performing or supervising the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
Sec. 56. NRS 630A.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.380 The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying the issuance of
a license or certificate:
1. Willful disclosure of a communication privileged under a
statute or court order.
-
*SB397*

– 37 –
2. Willful failure to comply with any provision of this chapter,
regulation, subpoena or order of the Board or with any court order
relating to this chapter.
3. Willful failure to perform any statutory or other legal
obligation imposed upon a licensed homeopathic physician [,] or a
licensed naturopathic physician or a certified advanced practitioner
of homeopathy , [or] a certified homeopathic assistant [,] or a
certified naturopathic assistant, as applicable.
Sec. 57. NRS 630A.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.390 1. Any person who becomes aware that a person
practicing homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or
practicing as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant in this State has, is
or is about to become engaged in conduct which constitutes grounds
for initiating disciplinary action may file a written complaint with
the Board. A complaint may be filed anonymously. If a complaint is
filed anonymously, the Board may accept the complaint but may
refuse to consider the complaint if anonymity of the complainant
makes processing the complaint impossible or unfair to the person
who is the subject of the complaint.
2. Any medical society or medical facility or facility for the
dependent licensed in this State shall report to the Board the
initiation and outcome of any disciplinary action against any
homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician, advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant concerning the care of a patient or the
competency of the homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician,
advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant [.]
or naturopathic assistant.
3. The clerk of every court shall report to the Board any
finding, judgment or other determination of the court that a
homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician, advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant [:] or
naturopathic assistant:
(a) Is mentally ill;
(b) Is mentally incompetent;
(c) Has been convicted of a felony or any law relating to
controlled substances or dangerous drugs;
(d) Is guilty of abuse or fraud under any state or federal program
providing medical assistance; or
(e) Is liable for damages for malpractice or negligence.
4. The Board shall retain all complaints filed with the Board
pursuant to this section for at least 10 years, including, without
limitation, any complaints not acted upon.
-
*SB397*

– 38 –
Sec. 58. NRS 630A.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.400 1. The Board or a committee of its members
designated by the Board shall review every complaint filed with the
Board and conduct an investigation to determine whether there is a
reasonable basis for compelling a homeopathic physician or
naturopathic physician to take a mental or physical examination or
an examination of his or her competence to practice homeopathic
medicine [.] or naturopathic medicine.
2. If a committee is designated, it must be composed of at least
three members of the Board, at least one of whom is :
(a) If the complaint is filed against a homeopathic physician, a
licensed homeopathic physician.
(b) If the complaint is filed against a naturopathic physician, a
licensed naturopathic physician.
3. If, from the complaint or from other official records, it
appears that the complaint is not frivolous and the complaint
charges gross or repeated malpractice, the Board may:
(a) Retain the Attorney General to investigate the complaint; and
(b) If the Board retains the Attorney General, transmit the
original complaint, along with further facts or information derived
from its own review, to the Attorney General.
4. Following an investigation, the committee shall present its
evaluation and recommendations to the Board. The Board shall
review the committee’s findings to determine whether to take any
further action, but a member of the Board who participated in the
investigation may not participate in this review or in any subsequent
hearing or action taken by the Board.
Sec. 59. NRS 630A.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.420 1. If the Board or its investigative committee has
reason to believe that the conduct of any homeopathic physician or
naturopathic physician has raised a reasonable question as to his or
her competence to practice homeopathic medicine or naturopathic
medicine , as applicable, with reasonable skill and safety to patients,
it may order the homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician
to undergo:
(a) A mental or physical examination; or
(b) An examination of his or her competence to practice
homeopathic medicine [,] or naturopathic medicine,
 by physicians or others designated by the Board to assist the
Board in determining the fitness of the homeopathic physician or
naturopathic physician to practice homeopathic medicine [.] or
naturopathic medicine, as applicable.
2. For the purposes of this section:
(a) Every homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician
who applies for a license or is licensed under this chapter shall be
-
*SB397*

– 39 –
deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical
examination or an examination of his or her competence to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine when directed to
do so in writing by the Board or an investigative committee of the
Board.
(b) The testimony or reports of the examining physicians are not
privileged communications.
3. Except in extraordinary circumstances, as determined by the
Board, the failure of a homeopathic physician or naturopathic
physician licensed under this chapter to submit to an examination
when directed as provided in this section constitutes an admission of
the charges against the homeopathic physician [.] or naturopathic
physician.
Sec. 60. NRS 630A.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.430 If the Board has reason to believe that the conduct of
any homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician has raised a
reasonable question as to his or her competence to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine with reasonable
skill and safety to patients, the Board may order an examination of
the homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician to determine
his or her fitness to practice homeopathic medicine [.] or
naturopathic medicine, as applicable. When such action is taken,
the reasons for the action must be documented and must be available
to the homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician being
examined.
Sec. 61. NRS 630A.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.440 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS, if the Board issues an order summarily suspending the license
of a homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician pending
proceedings for disciplinary action and requires the homeopathic
physician or naturopathic physician to submit to a mental or
physical examination or an examination of his or her competence to
practice homeopathic medicine [,] or naturopathic medicine, as
applicable, the examination must be conducted and the results
obtained not later than 60 days after the Board issues its order.
Sec. 62. NRS 630A.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.450 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS, if the Board issues an order summarily suspending the license
of a homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician pending
proceedings for disciplinary action, including, without limitation, a
summary suspension pursuant to NRS 233B.127, the court shall not
stay that order.
Sec. 63. NRS 630A.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.490 Except as otherwise provided in chapter 622A of
NRS:
-
*SB397*

– 40 –
1. Service of process made under this chapter must be either
personal or by registered or certified mail with return receipt
requested, addressed to the homeopathic physician, naturopathic
physician, advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant at his or her last known address.
If personal service cannot be made and if notice by mail is returned
undelivered, the Secretary-Treasurer of the Board shall cause notice
to be published once a week for 4 consecutive weeks in a newspaper
published in the county of the last known address of the
homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician, advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic physician or, if no newspaper is published in that
county, then in a newspaper widely distributed in that county.
2. Proof of service of process or publication of notice made
under this chapter must be filed with the Board and recorded in the
minutes of the Board.
Sec. 64. NRS 630A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.500 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 622A of
NRS, in any disciplinary hearing:
1. Proof of actual injury need not be established.
2. A certified copy of the record of a court or a licensing or
certifying agency showing a conviction or plea of nolo contendere
or the suspension, revocation, limitation, modification, denial or
surrender of a license to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or a certificate to practice as an advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant is conclusive evidence of its occurrence.
Sec. 65. NRS 630A.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.510 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
630A.150, any member of the Board who was not a member of the
investigative committee, if one was appointed, may participate in
the final order of the Board. If the Board, after notice and a hearing
as required by law, determines that a violation of the provisions of
this chapter or the regulations adopted by the Board has occurred, it
shall issue and serve on the person charged an order, in writing,
containing its findings and any sanctions imposed by the Board. If
the Board determines that no violation has occurred, it shall dismiss
the charges, in writing, and notify the person that the charges have
been dismissed.
2. If the Board finds that a violation has occurred, it may by
order:
(a) Place the person on probation for a specified period on any
of the conditions specified in the order.
(b) Administer to the person a public reprimand.
-
*SB397*

– 41 –
(c) Limit the practice of the person or exclude a method of
treatment from the scope of his or her practice.
(d) Suspend the license or certificate of the person for a
specified period or until further order of the Board.
(e) Revoke the person’s license to practice homeopathic
medicine or naturopathic medicine or certificate to practice as an
advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic
assistant [.] or naturopathic assistant.
(f) Require the person to participate in a program to correct an
alcohol or other substance use disorder or any other impairment.
(g) Require supervision of the person’s practice.
(h) Impose an administrative fine not to exceed $10,000.
(i) Require the person to perform community service without
compensation.
(j) Require the person to take a physical or mental examination
or an examination of his or her competence to practice homeopathic
medicine or naturopathic medicine or to practice as an advanced
practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant [,] or
naturopathic assistant, as applicable.
(k) Require the person to fulfill certain training or educational
requirements.
3. The Board shall not administer a private reprimand.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
Sec. 66. NRS 630A.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.520 1. Any person aggrieved by a final order of the
Board is entitled to judicial review of the Board’s order as provided
by law.
2. Every order of the Board which limits the practice of
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or the practice of
an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or of a] homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant or suspends or revokes a license
or certificate is effective from the date the Secretary-Treasurer of
the Board certifies the order until the date the order is modified or
reversed by a final judgment of the court. The court shall not stay
the order of the Board pending a final determination by the court.
3. The district court shall give a petition for judicial review of
the Board’s order priority over other civil matters which are not
expressly given priority by law.
Sec. 67. NRS 630A.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.530 1. Any person:
(a) Whose practice of homeopathic medicine or naturopathic
medicine has been limited; or
(b) Whose license to practice homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or certificate to practice as an advanced
-
*SB397*

– 42 –
practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or
naturopathic assistant has been:
(1) Suspended until further order; or
(2) Revoked,
 may apply to the Board for removal of the limitation or
suspension or may apply to the Board pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 622A of NRS for reinstatement of the revoked license or
certificate.
2. In hearing the application, the Board or a committee of
members of the Board:
(a) May require the applicant to submit to a mental or physical
examination or an examination of his or her competence to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or to practice as
an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic
assistant [,] or naturopathic assistant, as applicable, by physicians
or other persons whom it designates and submit such other evidence
of changed conditions and of fitness as it deems proper.
(b) Shall determine whether under all the circumstances the time
of the application is reasonable.
(c) May deny the application or modify or rescind its order as it
deems the evidence and the public safety warrants.
3. The applicant has the burden of proving by clear and
convincing evidence that the requirements for reinstatement of the
license or certificate or removal of the limitation or suspension have
been met.
4. The Board shall not reinstate a license or certificate unless it
is satisfied that the applicant has complied with all of the terms and
conditions set forth in the final order of the Board and that the
applicant is capable of practicing homeopathic medicine or
naturopathic medicine or practicing as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant [,] or naturopathic
assistant, as applicable, with reasonable skill and safety to patients.
5. In addition to any other requirements set forth in chapter
622A of NRS, to reinstate a license or certificate that has been
revoked by the Board, a person must apply for a license or
certificate and take an examination as though the person had never
been licensed or certified under this chapter.
Sec. 68. NRS 630A.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.540 1. In addition to any other immunity provided by
the provisions of chapter 622A of NRS:
(a) Any person who furnishes information to the Board, in good
faith in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, concerning a
person who is licensed or certified or applies for a license or
certificate under this chapter is immune from civil liability for
furnishing that information.
-
*SB397*

– 43 –
(b) The Board and its members, staff, counsel, investigators,
experts, committees, panels, hearing officers and consultants are
immune from civil liability for any decision or action taken in good
faith in response to information received by the Board.
(c) The Board and any of its members are immune from civil
liability for disseminating information concerning a person who is
licensed or certified or applies for a license or certificate under this
chapter to the Attorney General or any board or agency of the State,
hospital, medical society, insurer, employer, patient or patient’s
family or law enforcement agency.
2. The Board shall not commence an investigation, impose any
disciplinary action or take any other adverse action against a
homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician for:
(a) Disclosing to a governmental entity a violation of any law,
rule or regulation by an applicant for a license to practice
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or by a
homeopathic physician [;] or naturopathic physician; or
(b) Cooperating with a governmental entity that is conducting an
investigation, hearing or inquiry into such a violation, including,
without limitation, providing testimony concerning the violation.
3. As used in this section, “governmental entity” includes,
without limitation:
(a) A federal, state or local officer, employee, agency,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, authority
or other subdivision or entity of a public employer;
(b) A federal, state or local employee, committee, member or
commission of the Legislative Branch of Government;
(c) A federal, state or local representative, member or employee
of a legislative body or a county, town, village or any other political
subdivision or civil division of the State;
(d) A federal, state or local law enforcement agency or
prosecutorial office, or any member or employee thereof, or police
or peace officer; and
(e) A federal, state or local judiciary, or any member or
employee thereof, or grand or petit jury.
Sec. 69. NRS 630A.543 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.543 1. If the Board receives a copy of a court order
issued pursuant to NRS 425.540 that provides for the suspension of
all professional, occupational and recreational licenses, certificates
and permits issued to a person who is the holder of a license [to
practice homeopathic medicine] or a certificate [to practice as an
advanced practitioner of homeopathy or as a homeopathic assistant,]
issued pursuant to this chapter, the Board shall deem the license or
certificate issued to that person to be suspended at the end of the
30th day after the date on which the court order was issued unless
-
*SB397*

– 44 –
the Board receives a letter issued to the holder of the license or
certificate by the district attorney or other public agency pursuant to
NRS 425.550 stating that the holder of the license or certificate has
complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage
pursuant to NRS 425.560.
2. The Board shall reinstate a license [to practice homeopathic
medicine] or a certificate [to practice as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy or a homeopathic assistant] that has been suspended by
a district court pursuant to NRS 425.540 if:
(a) The Board receives a letter issued by the district attorney or
other public agency pursuant to NRS 425.550 to the person whose
license or certificate was suspended stating that the person whose
license or certificate was suspended has complied with the subpoena
or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560;
and
(b) The person whose license or certificate was suspended pays
the fee prescribed in NRS 630A.330 for the reinstatement of a
suspended license or certificate.
Sec. 70. NRS 630A.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.550 The filing and review of a complaint, its dismissal
without further action or its transmittal to the Attorney General, and
any subsequent disposition by the Board, the Attorney General or
any reviewing court do not preclude:
1. Any measure by a hospital or other institution or medical
society to limit or terminate the privileges of a homeopathic
physician, naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant
according to its rules or the custom of the profession. No civil
liability attaches to any such action taken without malice even if the
ultimate disposition of the complaint is in favor of the homeopathic
physician, naturopathic physician, advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or] homeopathic assistant [.] or naturopathic
assistant.
2. Any appropriate criminal prosecution by the Attorney
General or a district attorney based upon the same or other facts.
Sec. 71. NRS 630A.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.557 Any member or agent of the Board may enter any
premises in this State where a person who holds a license or
certificate issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter practices
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine and inspect it to
determine whether a violation of any provision of this chapter has
occurred, including, without limitation, an inspection to determine
whether any person at the premises is practicing homeopathic
medicine or naturopathic medicine without the appropriate license
or certificate issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
-
*SB397*

– 45 –
Sec. 72. NRS 630A.565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.565 1. In addition to any other remedy provided by
law, the Board, through its President or Secretary-Treasurer or the
Attorney General, may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction
to:
(a) Enjoin any prohibited act or other conduct of a homeopathic
physician or naturopathic physician which is harmful to the public;
(b) Enjoin any person who is not licensed under this chapter
from practicing homeopathic medicine [;] or naturopathic
medicine; or
(c) Limit a homeopathic physician’s or naturopathic
physician’s practice or suspend his or her license to practice
homeopathic medicine [.] or naturopathic medicine, as applicable.
2. The court in a proper case may issue a temporary restraining
order or a preliminary injunction for the purposes of subsection 1:
(a) Without proof of actual damage sustained by any person;
(b) Without relieving any person from criminal prosecution for
engaging in the practice of homeopathic medicine or naturopathic
medicine without a license; and
(c) Pending proceedings for disciplinary action by the Board.
Sec. 73. NRS 630A.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.570 1. The Board through its President or Secretary-
Treasurer or the Attorney General may maintain in any court of
competent jurisdiction a suit for an injunction against any person or
persons practicing homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine
without a license or practicing as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or naturopathic
assistant without the appropriate certificate.
2. Such an injunction:
(a) May be issued without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person, this provision being a preventive as well as a punitive
measure.
(b) Does not relieve such person from criminal prosecution for
practicing without a license or certificate.
Sec. 74. NRS 630A.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.580 In seeking injunctive relief against any person for an
alleged violation of this chapter by practicing homeopathic medicine
or naturopathic medicine without a license or practicing as an
advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant without the appropriate
certificate, it is sufficient to allege that the person did, upon a certain
day, and in a certain county of this State, engage in the practice of
homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or in the practice
of an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or of a] homeopathic
assistant or naturopathic assistant without having the appropriate
-
*SB397*

– 46 –
license or certificate to do so, without alleging any further or more
particular facts concerning the matter.
Sec. 75. NRS 630A.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.590 A person who:
1. Presents to the Board as his or her own the diploma, license,
certificate or credentials of another;
2. Gives either false or forged evidence of any kind to the
Board;
3. Practices homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine
or practices as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant under a false or
assumed name; [or]
4. Represents that a school or college is an approved school
of naturopathic medicine if the Board has not determined that the
school or college is an approved school of naturopathic medicine;
or
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 629.091, or unless a
greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS 200.830 or 200.840,
practices homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine or
practices as an advanced practitioner of homeopathy , [or as a]
homeopathic assistant or naturopathic assistant without being
appropriately licensed or certified under this chapter,
 is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided
in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 76. NRS 630A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630A.600 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 629.091, a
person who practices homeopathic medicine or naturopathic
medicine or who practices as an advanced practitioner of
homeopathy , [or as a] homeopathic assistant or naturopathic
assistant without the appropriate license or certificate issued
pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a category D felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130, unless a greater penalty is
provided pursuant to NRS 200.830 or 200.840.
2. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, if the
Board determines that a person is practicing homeopathic medicine
or naturopathic medicine without a license or certificate issued
pursuant to this chapter, the Board may:
(a) Issue and serve on the person an order to cease and desist
until the person obtains from the Board the proper license or
certificate or otherwise demonstrates that he or she is no longer in
violation of subsection 1. An order to cease and desist must include
a telephone number with which the person may contact the Board.
(b) Issue a citation to the person. A citation issued pursuant to
this paragraph must be in writing, describe with particularity the
nature of the violation and inform the person of the provisions of
-
*SB397*

– 47 –
this paragraph. Each activity in which the person is engaged
constitutes a separate offense for which a separate citation may be
issued. To appeal a citation, the person must submit a written
request for a hearing to the Board not later than 30 days after the
date of issuance of the citation.
(c) Assess against the person an administrative fine of not more
than $5,000.
(d) Impose any combination of the penalties set forth in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
Sec. 77. NRS 633.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.171 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) The practice of medicine or perfusion pursuant to chapter
630 of NRS, naturopathic medicine, dentistry, chiropractic,
naprapathy, podiatry, optometry, respiratory care, faith or Christian
Science healing, nursing, veterinary medicine or fitting hearing aids.
(b) A medical officer of the Armed Forces or a medical officer
of any division or department of the United States in the discharge
of his or her official duties, including, without limitation, providing
medical care in a hospital in accordance with an agreement entered
into pursuant to NRS 449.2455.
(c) Osteopathic physicians who are called into this State, other
than on a regular basis, for consultation or assistance to a physician
licensed in this State, and who are legally qualified to practice in the
state where they reside.
(d) Osteopathic physicians who are temporarily exempt from
licensure pursuant to NRS 633.420 and are practicing osteopathic
medicine within the scope of the exemption.
(e) The performance of medical services by a student enrolled in
an educational program for a physician assistant which is accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant, Inc., or its successor organization, as part of
such a program.
(f) A physician assistant of any division or department of the
United States in the discharge of his or her official duties unless
licensure by a state is required by the division or department of the
United States.
(g) Any person permitted to practice any other healing art under
this title who does so within the scope of that authority.
2. This chapter does not repeal or affect any law of this State
regulating or affecting any other healing art.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services of a person in cases of emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
-
*SB397*

– 48 –
Sec. 78. NRS 634A.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
634A.025 1. This chapter does not apply to Oriental
physicians who are:
(a) Called into this State for consultation; or
(b) Temporarily exempt from licensure pursuant to NRS
634A.163 and are practicing Oriental medicine within the scope of
the exemption.
2. This chapter does not apply to a practitioner of acupuncture:
(a) Who is employed by an accredited school of Oriental
medicine located in this State;
(b) Who is licensed to practice acupuncture in another state or
jurisdiction; and
(c) Whose practice of acupuncture in this State:
(1) Is limited to teaching, supervising or demonstrating the
methods and practices of acupuncture to students in a clinical
setting; and
(2) Does not involve the acceptance of payment from any
patient for services relating to his or her practice of acupuncture.
3. This chapter does not apply to a physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic
physician who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
4. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Gratuitous services of druggists or other persons in cases of
emergency.
(b) The domestic administration of family remedies.
(c) Any person from assisting any person in the practice of the
healing arts licensed under this chapter, except that such person may
not insert needles into the skin or prescribe herbal medicine.
5. For the purposes of this section, “accredited school of
Oriental medicine” means a school that has received at least
candidacy status for institutional accreditation from the
Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine,
or its successor organization.
Sec. 79. NRS 640.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640.190 This chapter does not authorize a physical therapist,
whether licensed or not, to practice medicine, osteopathic medicine,
naprapathy, homeopathic medicine, naturopathic medicine,
chiropractic or any other form or method of healing.
Sec. 80. NRS 640B.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
640B.085 “Physician” means:
1. A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS;
2. An osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 633 of
NRS;
3. A homeopathic physician or naturopathic physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS;
-
*SB397*

– 49 –
4. A chiropractic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of
NRS;
5. A naprapath licensed pursuant to chapter 634B of NRS; or
6. A podiatric physician licensed pursuant to chapter 635 of
NRS.
Sec. 81. NRS 641C.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641C.130 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. A physician who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS [;] or a naturopathic physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS;
2. A nurse who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
632 of NRS and is authorized by the State Board of Nursing to
engage in the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and other
substance use disorders or the practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling;
3. A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227;
4. A clinical professional counselor or clinical professional
counselor intern who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS;
5. A marriage and family therapist or marriage and family
therapist intern who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
641A of NRS and is authorized by the Board of Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors to engage in the practice of counseling persons with
alcohol and other substance use disorders or the practice of
counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling;
6. A person who is:
(a) Licensed as:
(1) A clinical social worker pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641B of NRS; or
(2) A master social worker or an independent social worker
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641B of NRS and is engaging
in clinical social work as part of an internship program approved by
the Board of Examiners for Social Workers; and
(b) Authorized by the Board of Examiners for Social Workers to
engage in the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and other
substance use disorders or the practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling; or
7. A person who provides or supervises the provision of peer
recovery support services in accordance with NRS 433.622 to
433.641, inclusive.
-
*SB397*

– 50 –
Sec. 82. NRS 641C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641C.430 The Board may issue a certificate as a problem
gambling counselor to:
1. A person who:
(a) Is not less than 21 years of age;
(b) Has received a bachelor’s degree, master’s degree or a
doctoral degree from an accredited college or university in a field of
social science approved by the Board;
(c) Has completed not less than 60 hours of training specific to
problem gambling approved by the Board;
(d) Has completed at least 2,000 hours of supervised counseling
of persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling in a setting
approved by the Board;
(e) Passes the written and oral examination prescribed by the
Board pursuant to NRS 641C.290;
(f) Presents himself or herself when scheduled for an interview
at a meeting of the Board;
(g) Pays the fees required pursuant to NRS 641C.470; and
(h) Submits all information required to complete an application
for a certificate.
2. A person who:
(a) Is not less than 21 years of age;
(b) Is licensed as:
(1) A clinical social worker pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS;
(2) A clinical professional counselor pursuant to chapter
641A of NRS;
(3) A marriage and family therapist pursuant to chapter 641A
of NRS;
(4) A physician pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS [;] or
a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of
NRS;
(5) A nurse pursuant to chapter 632 of NRS and has received
a master’s degree or a doctoral degree from an accredited college or
university;
(6) A psychologist pursuant to chapter 641 of NRS;
(7) An alcohol and drug counselor pursuant to this chapter;
or
(8) A clinical alcohol and drug counselor pursuant to this
chapter;
(c) Has completed not less than 60 hours of training specific to
problem gambling approved by the Board;
(d) Has completed at least 1,000 hours of supervised counseling
of persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling in a setting
approved by the Board;
-
*SB397*

– 51 –
(e) Passes the written and oral examination prescribed by the
Board pursuant to NRS 641C.290;
(f) Pays the fees required pursuant to NRS 641C.470; and
(g) Submits all information required to complete an application
for a certificate.
Sec. 83. NRS 644A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.150 1. The following persons are exempt from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Except for those provisions relating to advanced estheticians,
all persons authorized by the laws of this State to practice nursing,
medicine, naturopathic medicine, dentistry, osteopathic medicine,
chiropractic, naprapathy or podiatry.
(b) Commissioned medical officers of the Armed Forces of the
United States when engaged in the actual performance of their
official duties, and attendants attached to a unit in a branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States that provides medical services.
(c) Barbers, insofar as their usual and ordinary vocation and
profession is concerned, when engaged in any of the following
practices:
(1) Cleansing or singeing the hair of any person.
(2) Massaging, cleansing, stimulating, exercising or similar
work upon the scalp, face or neck of any person, with the hands or
with mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances, or by the use
of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams.
(d) Retailers, at a retail establishment, insofar as their usual and
ordinary vocation and profession is concerned, when engaged in the
demonstration of cosmetics if:
(1) The demonstration is without charge to the person to
whom the demonstration is given; and
(2) The retailer does not advertise or provide a service
relating to the practice of cosmetology except cosmetics and
fragrances.
(e) Photographers or their employees, insofar as their usual and
ordinary vocation and profession is concerned, if the photographer
or his or her employee does not advertise cosmetological services or
the practice of makeup artistry and provides cosmetics without
charge to the customer.
2. Any school of cosmetology conducted as part of the
vocational rehabilitation training program of the Department of
Corrections or the Caliente Youth Center:
(a) Is exempt from the requirements of paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 644A.740.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 644A.735, shall
maintain a staff of at least one licensed instructor.
-
*SB397*

– 52 –
3. Any health care professional, as defined in NRS 453C.030,
is exempt from the provisions of this chapter relating to advanced
estheticians.
Sec. 84. NRS 653.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
653.430 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. A physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS.
2. A naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS.
3. A dentist, dental hygienist, dental therapist or expanded
function dental assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 631 of NRS or
a dental assistant working within the scope of his or her employment
under the direct supervision of:
(a) A dentist; or
(b) Where authorized by NRS 631.287, a dental hygienist who
holds a special endorsement to practice public health dental hygiene.
[3.] 4. A chiropractic physician or chiropractic assistant
licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of NRS.
[4.] 5. A person training to become a chiropractic assistant or a
student practicing in the preceptor program established by the
Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada pursuant to
NRS 634.1375.
[5.] 6. A podiatric physician or podiatry hygienist licensed
pursuant to chapter 635 of NRS, or a person training to be a podiatry
hygienist.
[6.] 7. A veterinarian or veterinary technician licensed
pursuant to chapter 638 of NRS or any other person performing
tasks under the supervision of a veterinarian or veterinary technician
as authorized by regulation of the Nevada State Board of Veterinary
Medical Examiners.
[7.] 8. The performance of mammography in accordance with
NRS 457.182 to 457.187, inclusive.
[8.] 9. Any employee of the Armed Forces of the United States
or any division or department of the United States who engages in
radiologic imaging or radiation therapy in the discharge of his or her
official duties, including, without limitation, while providing care in
a hospital in accordance with an agreement entered into pursuant to
NRS 449.2455.
Sec. 85. NRS 0.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
0.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
“physician” means a person who engages in the practice of
medicine, including osteopathy , [and] homeopathy [.] and
naturopathy.
2. The terms “physician,” “osteopathic physician,”
“homeopathic physician,” “naturopathic physician,” “chiropractic
-
*SB397*

– 53 –
physician” and “podiatric physician” are used in chapters 630,
630A, 633, 634 and 635 of NRS in the limited senses prescribed by
those chapters respectively.
Sec. 86. NRS 7.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
7.095 1. An attorney shall not contract for or collect a fee
contingent on the amount of recovery for representing a person
seeking damages in connection with an action for injury or death
against a provider of health care based upon professional negligence
in excess of 35 percent of the amount recovered.
2. The limitations set forth in subsection 1 apply to all forms of
recovery, including, without limitation, settlement, arbitration and
judgment.
3. For the purposes of this section, “recovered” means the net
sum recovered by the plaintiff after deducting any disbursements or
costs incurred in connection with the prosecution or settlement of
the claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and general
and administrative expenses incurred by the office of the attorney
are not deductible disbursements or costs.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(b) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, naturopathic physician
licensed under chapter 630A of NRS, registered nurse, dispensing
optician, optometrist, registered physical therapist, podiatric
physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician, naprapath,
doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a limited license
issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, medical
laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a licensed
hospital and its employees.
Sec. 87. NRS 41.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.505 1. Any person licensed under the provisions of
chapter 630, 632 or 633 of NRS , or licensed as a naturopathic
physician under the provisions of chapter 630A of NRS, and any
person who holds an equivalent license issued by another state, who
renders emergency care or assistance, including, without limitation,
emergency obstetrical care or assistance, in an emergency,
gratuitously and in good faith, is not liable for any civil damages as
a result of any act or omission, not amounting to gross negligence,
by that person in rendering the emergency care or assistance or as a
-
*SB397*

– 54 –
result of any failure to act, not amounting to gross negligence, to
provide or arrange for further medical treatment for the injured or ill
person. This section does not excuse a physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or nurse from liability for
damages resulting from that person’s acts or omissions which occur
in a licensed medical facility relative to any person with whom there
is a preexisting relationship as a patient.
2. Any person licensed under the provisions of chapter 630,
632 or 633 of NRS , or licensed as a naturopathic physician under
the provisions of chapter 630A of NRS, and any person who holds
an equivalent license issued by another state who:
(a) Is retired or otherwise does not practice on a full-time basis;
and
(b) Gratuitously and in good faith, renders medical care within
the scope of that person’s license to an indigent person,
 is not liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or
omission by that person, not amounting to gross negligence or
reckless, willful or wanton conduct, in rendering that care.
3. Any person licensed to practice medicine under the
provisions of chapter 630 or 633 of NRS , or licensed to practice
naturopathic medicine under the provisions of chapter 630A of
NRS or licensed to practice dentistry under the provisions of chapter
631 of NRS who renders care or assistance to a patient for a
governmental entity or a nonprofit organization is not liable for any
civil damages as a result of any act or omission by that person in
rendering that care or assistance if the care or assistance is rendered
gratuitously, in good faith and in a manner not amounting to gross
negligence or reckless, willful or wanton conduct.
4. As used in this section, “gratuitously” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 41.500.
Sec. 88. NRS 41.506 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.506 1. Any person licensed under the provisions of
chapter 630, 632 or 633 of NRS , or any person licensed as a
naturopathic physician under the provisions of chapter 630A of
NRS, and any person who holds an equivalent license issued by
another state who renders emergency obstetrical care or assistance
to a pregnant woman during labor or the delivery of the child is not
liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission by that
person in rendering that care or assistance if:
(a) The care or assistance is rendered in good faith and in a
manner not amounting to gross negligence or reckless, willful or
wanton conduct;
(b) The person has not previously provided prenatal or
obstetrical care to the woman; and
-
*SB397*

– 55 –
(c) The damages are reasonably related to or primarily caused
by a lack of prenatal care received by the woman.
2. A licensed medical facility in which such care or assistance
is rendered is not liable for any civil damages as a result of any act
or omission by the person in rendering that care or assistance if that
person is not liable for any civil damages pursuant to subsection 1
and the actions of the medical facility relating to the rendering of
that care or assistance do not amount to gross negligence or
reckless, willful or wanton conduct.
Sec. 89. NRS 41A.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41A.017 “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, naturopathic physician, dentist, licensed
nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical therapist,
podiatric physician, licensed psychologist, chiropractic physician,
naprapath, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a license or a
limited license issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS,
medical laboratory director or technician, licensed dietitian or a
licensed hospital, clinic, surgery center, physicians’ professional
corporation or group practice that employs any such person and its
employees.
Sec. 90. NRS 41A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41A.110 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
442.253, a physician licensed to practice medicine under the
provisions of chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, a naturopathic physician
licensed under the provisions of chapter 630A of NRS or a dentist
licensed to practice dentistry under the provisions of chapter 631 of
NRS, has conclusively obtained the consent of a patient for a
medical, surgical or dental procedure, as appropriate, if the
physician or dentist has done the following:
1. Explained to the patient in general terms, without specific
details, the procedure to be undertaken;
2. Explained to the patient alternative methods of treatment, if
any, and their general nature;
3. Explained to the patient that there may be risks, together
with the general nature and extent of the risks involved, without
enumerating such risks; and
4. Obtained the signature of the patient to a statement
containing an explanation of the procedure, alternative methods of
treatment and risks involved, as provided in this section.
Sec. 91. NRS 42.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
42.021 1. In an action for injury or death against a provider
of health care based upon professional negligence, if the defendant
so elects, the defendant may introduce evidence of any amount
payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the injury or death
-
*SB397*

– 56 –
pursuant to the United States Social Security Act, any state or
federal income disability or worker’s compensation act, any health,
sickness or income-disability insurance, accident insurance that
provides health benefits or income-disability coverage, and any
contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership or
corporation to provide, pay for or reimburse the cost of medical,
hospital, dental or other health care services. If the defendant elects
to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of
any amount that the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure the
plaintiff’s right to any insurance benefits concerning which the
defendant has introduced evidence.
2. A source of collateral benefits introduced pursuant to
subsection 1 may not:
(a) Recover any amount against the plaintiff; or
(b) Be subrogated to the rights of the plaintiff against a
defendant.
3. In an action for injury or death against a provider of health
care based upon professional negligence, a district court shall, at the
request of either party, enter a judgment ordering that money
damages or its equivalent for future damages of the judgment
creditor be paid in whole or in part by periodic payments rather than
by a lump-sum payment if the award equals or exceeds $50,000 in
future damages.
4. In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future
damages by periodic payments pursuant to subsection 3, the court
shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of periodic
payments that will compensate the judgment creditor for such future
damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of future
damages, the court shall require a judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to assure full payment
of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall order the return
of this security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
5. A judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments entered pursuant to subsection 3 must specify the
recipient or recipients of the payments, the dollar amount of the
payments, the interval between payments, and the number of
payments or the period of time over which payments will be made.
Such payments must only be subject to modification in the event of
the death of the judgment creditor. Money damages awarded for loss
of future earnings must not be reduced or payments terminated by
reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be paid to
persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support, as
provided by law, immediately before the judgment creditor’s death.
In such cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may,
-
*SB397*

– 57 –
upon petition of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award
and apportion the unpaid future damages in accordance with this
subsection.
6. If the court finds that the judgment debtor has exhibited a
continuing pattern of failing to make the periodic payments as
specified pursuant to subsection 5, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment
creditor all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic
payments, including, but not limited to, court costs and attorney’s
fees.
7. Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security
given pursuant to subsection 4 reverts to the judgment debtor.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Future damages” includes damages for future medical
treatment, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily
function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) “Periodic payments” means the payment of money or
delivery of other property to the judgment creditor at regular
intervals.
(c) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission
to act by a provider of health care in the rendering of professional
services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal
injury or wrongful death. The term does not include services that are
outside the scope of services for which the provider of health care is
licensed or services for which any restriction has been imposed by
the applicable regulatory board or health care facility.
(d) “Provider of health care” means a physician licensed under
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, naturopathic physician, dentist,
licensed nurse, dispensing optician, optometrist, registered physical
therapist, podiatric physician, naprapath, licensed psychologist,
chiropractic physician, doctor of Oriental medicine, holder of a
license or a limited license issued under the provisions of chapter
653 of NRS, medical laboratory director or technician, licensed
dietitian or a licensed hospital and its employees.
Sec. 92. NRS 49.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
49.215 As used in NRS 49.215 to 49.245, inclusive:
1. A communication is “confidential” if it is not intended to be
disclosed to third persons other than:
(a) Those present to further the interest of the patient in the
consultation, examination or interview;
(b) Persons reasonably necessary for the transmission of the
communication; or
-
*SB397*

– 58 –
(c) Persons who are participating in the diagnosis and treatment
under the direction of the doctor, including members of the patient’s
family.
2. “Doctor” means a person licensed to practice medicine,
naturopathic medicine, dentistry , [or] osteopathic medicine,
chiropractic or naprapathy in any state or nation, or a person who is
reasonably believed by the patient to be so licensed, and in addition
includes a person employed by a public or private agency as a
psychiatric social worker, or someone under his or her guidance,
direction or control, while engaged in the examination, diagnosis or
treatment of a patient for a mental condition.
3. “Patient” means a person who consults or is examined or
interviewed by a doctor for purposes of diagnosis or treatment.
Sec. 93. NRS 89.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
89.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
professional entity may be organized only for the purpose of
rendering one specific type of professional service and may not
engage in any business other than rendering the professional service
for which it was organized and services reasonably related thereto,
except that a professional entity may own real and personal property
appropriate to its business and may invest its money in any form of
real property, securities or any other type of investment.
2. A professional entity may be organized to render a
professional service relating to:
(a) Architecture, interior design, residential design, engineering
and landscape architecture, or any combination thereof, and may be
composed of persons:
(1) Engaged in the practice of architecture as provided in
chapter 623 of NRS;
(2) Practicing as a registered interior designer as provided in
chapter 623 of NRS;
(3) Engaged in the practice of residential design as provided
in chapter 623 of NRS;
(4) Engaged in the practice of landscape architecture as
provided in chapter 623A of NRS; and
(5) Engaged in the practice of professional engineering as
provided in chapter 625 of NRS.
(b) Medicine, homeopathy, naturopathic medicine, osteopathy,
naprapathy, chiropractic and psychology, or any combination
thereof, and may be composed of persons engaged in the practice of:
(1) Medicine as provided in chapter 630 of NRS;
(2) Homeopathic medicine or naturopathic medicine as
provided in chapter 630A of NRS;
(3) Osteopathic medicine as provided in chapter 633 of NRS;
(4) Chiropractic as provided in chapter 634 of NRS;
-
*SB397*

– 59 –
(5) Naprapathy as provided in chapter 634B of NRS; and
(6) Psychology and licensed to provide services pursuant to
chapter 641 of NRS.
 Such a professional entity may market and manage additional
professional entities which are organized to render a professional
service relating to medicine, homeopathy, osteopathy, naprapathy,
chiropractic and psychology.
(c) Mental health services, and may be composed of the
following persons, in any number and in any combination:
(1) Any psychologist who is licensed to practice in this State;
(2) Any social worker who holds a master’s degree in social
work and who is licensed by this State as a clinical social worker;
(3) Any registered nurse who is licensed to practice
professional nursing in this State and who holds a master’s degree in
the field of psychiatric nursing;
(4) Any marriage and family therapist who is licensed by this
State pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS; and
(5) Any clinical professional counselor who is licensed by
this State pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
 Such a professional entity may market and manage additional
professional entities which are organized to render a professional
service relating to mental health services pursuant to this paragraph.
3. A professional entity may render a professional service only
through its officers, managers and employees who are licensed or
otherwise authorized by law to render the professional service.
Sec. 94. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
-
*SB397*

– 60 –
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, a naturopathic physician, an advanced
practitioner of homeopathy, a homeopathic assistant, a naturopathic
assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician assistant or
anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 633 of NRS, a
podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical therapist, a
medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a chiropractic
physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor of Oriental
-
*SB397*

– 61 –
medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing assistant, a
nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a person who
provides health care services in the home for compensation, a
dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental hygienist
student, an expanded function dental assistant, an expanded function
dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a pharmacy student, an intern
pharmacist, an attendant on an ambulance or air ambulance, a
psychologist, a social worker, a marriage and family therapist, a
marriage and family therapist intern, a clinical professional
counselor, a clinical professional counselor intern, a behavior
analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a registered behavior
technician, a mental health technician, a licensed dietitian, the
holder of a license or a limited license issued under the provisions of
chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health care facility,
an emergency medical technician, an advanced emergency medical
technician, a paramedic or a participant in a program of training to
provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
-
*SB397*

– 62 –
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
-
*SB397*

– 63 –
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 95. NRS 200.5093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.5093 1. Any person who is described in subsection 4 and
who, in a professional or occupational capacity, knows or has
reasonable cause to believe that an older person or vulnerable
person has been abused, neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned
shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, report the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person to:
(1) The local office of the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) A police department or sheriff’s office; or
(3) A toll-free telephone service designated by the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(b) Make such a report as soon as reasonably practicable but not
later than 24 hours after the person knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that the older person or vulnerable person has been abused,
neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned.
2. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the
abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of the older
person or vulnerable person involves an act or omission of the
Aging and Disability Services Division, another division of the
Department of Health and Human Services or a law enforcement
agency, the person shall make the report to an agency other than the
one alleged to have committed the act or omission.
3. Each agency, after reducing a report to writing, shall forward
a copy of the report to the Aging and Disability Services Division of
the Department of Health and Human Services and the Unit for the
Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
4. A report must be made pursuant to subsection 1 by the
following persons:
(a) Every physician, dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function
dental assistant, chiropractic physician, naprapath, optometrist,
podiatric physician, medical examiner, resident, intern, professional
or practical nurse, physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS, anesthesiologist assistant, naturopathic
assistant, homeopathic assistant, perfusionist, psychiatrist,
-
*SB397*

– 64 –
psychologist, marriage and family therapist, clinical professional
counselor, clinical alcohol and drug counselor, alcohol and drug
counselor, music therapist, athletic trainer, driver of an ambulance,
paramedic, licensed dietitian, holder of a license or a limited license
issued under the provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, behavior
analyst, assistant behavior analyst, registered behavior technician,
peer recovery support specialist, as defined in NRS 433.627, peer
recovery support specialist supervisor, as defined in NRS 433.629,
or other person providing medical services licensed or certified to
practice in this State, who examines, attends or treats an older
person or vulnerable person who appears to have been abused,
neglected, exploited, isolated or abandoned.
(b) Any personnel of a hospital or similar institution engaged in
the admission, examination, care or treatment of persons or an
administrator, manager or other person in charge of a hospital or
similar institution upon notification of the suspected abuse, neglect,
exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an older person or
vulnerable person by a member of the staff of the hospital.
(c) A coroner.
(d) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide personal care services in the home.
(e) Every person who maintains or is employed by an agency to
provide nursing in the home.
(f) Every person who operates, who is employed by or who
contracts to provide services for an intermediary service
organization as defined in NRS 449.4304.
(g) Any employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services, except the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman appointed
pursuant to NRS 427A.125 and any of his or her advocates or
volunteers where prohibited from making such a report pursuant to
45 C.F.R. § 1321.11.
(h) Any employee of a law enforcement agency or a county’s
office for protective services or an adult or juvenile probation
officer.
(i) Any person who maintains or is employed by a facility or
establishment that provides care for older persons or vulnerable
persons.
(j) Any person who maintains, is employed by or serves as a
volunteer for an agency or service which advises persons regarding
the abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment of an
older person or vulnerable person and refers them to persons and
agencies where their requests and needs can be met.
(k) Every social worker.
(l) Any person who owns or is employed by a funeral home or
mortuary.
-
*SB397*

– 65 –
(m) Every person who operates or is employed by a community
health worker pool, as defined in NRS 449.0028, or with whom a
community health worker pool contracts to provide the services of a
community health worker, as defined in NRS 449.0027.
(n) Every person who is enrolled with the Division of Health
Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services to provide doula services to recipients of Medicaid
pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
5. A report may be made by any other person.
6. If a person who is required to make a report pursuant to
subsection 1 knows or has reasonable cause to believe that an older
person or vulnerable person has died as a result of abuse, neglect,
isolation or abandonment, the person shall, as soon as reasonably
practicable, report this belief to the appropriate medical examiner or
coroner, who shall investigate the cause of death of the older person
or vulnerable person and submit to the appropriate local law
enforcement agencies, the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes his or her written findings. The written
findings must include the information required pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 200.5094, when possible.
7. A division, office or department which receives a report
pursuant to this section shall cause the investigation of the report to
commence within 3 working days. A copy of the final report of the
investigation conducted by a division, office or department, other
than the Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department
of Health and Human Services, must be forwarded within 30 days
after the completion of the report to the:
(a) Aging and Disability Services Division;
(b) Repository for Information Concerning Crimes Against
Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons created by NRS 179A.450;
and
(c) Unit for the Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes.
8. If the investigation of a report results in the belief that an
older person or vulnerable person is abused, neglected, exploited,
isolated or abandoned, the Aging and Disability Services Division
of the Department of Health and Human Services or the county’s
office for protective services may provide protective services to the
older person or vulnerable person if the older person or vulnerable
person is able and willing to accept them.
9. A person who knowingly and willfully violates any of the
provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
10. As used in this section, “Unit for the Investigation and
Prosecution of Crimes” means the Unit for the Investigation and
-
*SB397*

– 66 –
Prosecution of Crimes Against Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons
in the Office of the Attorney General created pursuant to
NRS 228.265.
Sec. 96. NRS 232.8415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8415 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards shall be responsible for:
(a) Centralized administration;
(b) A uniform set of standards for investigations, licensing
and discipline, including, without limitation, separating the roles and
responsibilities for occupational licensure from the roles and
responsibilities for occupational discipline;
(c) A uniform set of standards for internal controls;
(d) A uniform set of standards for legal representation;
(e) A consistent set of structural standards for boards and
commissions;
(f) Transparency and consumer protection; and
(g) Efficacy and efficiency.
2. To the extent permitted by the Nevada Constitution and
federal law, all professional and occupational licensing boards
created by the Legislature shall be under the purview of the Office,
including, without limitation:
(a) The Nevada State Board of Accountancy created by
NRS 628.035.
(b) The Board of Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors created by NRS 641C.150.
(c) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design created by NRS 623.050.
(d) The Board of Athletic Trainers created by NRS 640B.170.
(e) The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board created by
NRS 643.020.
(f) The Board of Applied Behavior Analysis created by
NRS 641D.200.
(g) The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 634.020.
(h) The State Contractors’ Board created by NRS 624.040.
(i) The Commission on Construction Education created by
NRS 624.570.
(j) The State Board of Cosmetology created by NRS 644A.200.
(k) The Certified Court Reporters’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 656.040.
(l) The Board of Dental Examiners of Nevada created by
NRS 631.120.
(m) The Committee on Dental Hygiene and Dental Therapy
created by NRS 631.205.
-
*SB397*

– 67 –
(n) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors created by NRS 625.100.
(o) The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services Board created
by NRS 642.020.
(p) The Nevada Board of Homeopathic and Naturopathic
Medical Examiners created pursuant to NRS 630A.100.
(q) The State Board of Landscape Architecture created by
NRS 623A.080.
(r) The Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists
and Clinical Professional Counselors created by NRS 641A.090.
(s) The Board of Massage Therapy created by NRS 640C.150.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners created pursuant to
NRS 630.050.
(u) The State Board of Nursing created by NRS 632.020.
(v) The Advisory Committee on Nursing Assistants and
Medication Aides created by NRS 632.072.
(w) The Board of Occupational Therapy created by
NRS 640A.080.
(x) The Board of Dispensing Opticians created by NRS 637.030.
(y) The Nevada State Board of Optometry created by
NRS 636.030.
(z) The State Board of Oriental Medicine created by
NRS 634A.030.
(aa) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine created pursuant
to NRS 633.181.
(bb) The Commission on Postsecondary Education created by
NRS 394.383.
(cc) The State Board of Pharmacy created by NRS 639.020.
(dd) The Nevada Physical Therapy Board created by
NRS 640.030.
(ee) The State Board of Podiatry created by NRS 635.020.
(ff) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board created by
NRS 648.020.
(gg) The Board of Psychological Examiners created by
NRS 641.030.
(hh) The Board of Environmental Health Specialists created by
NRS 625A.030.
(ii) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers created
pursuant to NRS 641B.100.
(jj) The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and Hearing
Aid Dispensing Board created by NRS 637B.100.
(kk) The Nevada State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners
created by NRS 638.020.
-
*SB397*

– 68 –
Sec. 97. NRS 287.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.020 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may adopt and carry into effect a system of medical or
hospital service, or a combination thereof, through nonprofit
membership corporations defraying the cost of medical service or
hospital care, or both, open to participation by all licentiates of the
particular class, whether doctors of medicine, doctors of
naturopathic medicine, doctors of osteopathy, doctors of
naprapathy or doctors of chiropractic, offering services through such
a nonprofit membership corporation, for the benefit of such of their
officers and employees, and the dependents of such officers and
employees, as may elect to accept membership in such nonprofit
corporation and who have authorized the governing body to make
deductions from their compensation for the payment of membership
dues.
2. A part, not to exceed 50 percent, of the cost of such
membership dues may be defrayed by such governing body by
contribution. The money for such contributions must be budgeted
for in accordance with the laws governing such county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada.
3. The power conferred in this section, with respect to the
rendition of medical or hospital service, or a combination thereof, is
coextensive with the power conferred in NRS 287.010 with respect
to insurance companies.
4. If a school district offers coverage for medical service or
hospital care, or both, to its officers and employees pursuant to this
section, members of the board of trustees of the school district must
not be excluded from participating in the coverage. If the amount of
the deductions from compensation required to pay for the coverage
exceeds the compensation to which a trustee is entitled, the
difference must be paid by the trustee.
Sec. 98. NRS 288.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.140 1. It is the right of every local government
employee, subject to the limitations provided in subsections 3, 4 and
5, to join any employee organization of the employee’s choice or to
refrain from joining any employee organization. A local government
employer shall not discriminate in any way among its employees on
account of membership or nonmembership in an employee
organization.
2. The recognition of an employee organization for negotiation,
pursuant to this chapter, does not preclude any local government
-
*SB397*

– 69 –
employee who is not a member of that employee organization from
acting for himself or herself with respect to any condition of his or
her employment, but any action taken on a request or in adjustment
of a grievance shall be consistent with the terms of an applicable
negotiated agreement, if any.
3. A police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff or other law
enforcement officer may be a member of an employee organization
only if such employee organization is composed exclusively of law
enforcement officers.
4. A civilian employee of a metropolitan police department
which is organized pursuant to chapter 280 of NRS may be a
member of an employee organization only if such employee
organization is composed exclusively of civilian employees of a
metropolitan police department which is organized pursuant to
chapter 280 of NRS.
5. The following persons may not be a member of an employee
organization:
(a) A supervisory employee described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.138, including but not limited to appointed
officials and department heads who are primarily responsible for
formulating and administering management, policy and programs.
(b) A doctor or physician who is employed by a local
government employer.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, an attorney
who is employed by a local government employer and who is
assigned to a civil law division, department or agency. The
provisions of this paragraph do not apply with respect to an attorney
for the duration of a collective bargaining agreement to which the
attorney is a party as of July 1, 2011.
6. As used in this section, “doctor or physician” means a
doctor, physician, homeopathic physician, naturopathic physician,
osteopathic physician, naprapath, chiropractic physician,
practitioner of Oriental medicine, podiatric physician or practitioner
of optometry, as those terms are defined or used, respectively, in
NRS 630.014, 630A.050, 633.091, chapter 634 of NRS, chapter
634A of NRS, NRS 634B.050, chapter 635 of NRS or chapter 636
of NRS [.] and section 12 of this act.
Sec. 99. NRS 441A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
441A.110 “Provider of health care” means a physician,
naturopathic physician, nurse, anesthesiologist assistant or
veterinarian licensed in accordance with state law, a physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS or a
pharmacist registered pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS.
-
*SB397*

– 70 –
Sec. 100. NRS 441A.315 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
441A.315 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
physician, naturopathic physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse or midwife who provides or supervises the
provision of emergency medical services in a hospital or primary
care to a patient who is 15 years of age or older shall, in accordance
with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 4:
(a) Consult with the patient to ascertain whether he or she
wishes to be tested for sexually transmitted diseases, including,
without limitation, the human immunodeficiency virus, and to
determine which tests, if any, are medically indicated for the patient;
and
(b) If the patient wishes to be tested, conduct any test which is
medically indicated for the patient or assist the patient with
obtaining any such test, to the extent practicable for the physician,
naturopathic physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse or midwife.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a hospital that
provides emergency medical services or primary care to a patient
who is 15 years of age or older shall, in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 4:
(a) Ensure that the patient is consulted to ascertain whether he or
she wishes to be tested for sexually transmitted diseases, including,
without limitation, the human immunodeficiency virus, and to
determine which tests, if any, are medically indicated for the patient;
and
(b) If the patient wishes to be tested, ensure that any test which
is medically indicated for the patient is conducted or that the patient
is assisted with obtaining any such test, to the extent practicable for
the hospital.
3. A physician, naturopathic physician, physician assistant,
advanced practice registered nurse, midwife or hospital is not
required to comply with the requirements of subsection 1 or 2 if the
physician, naturopathic physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse or midwife or a provider of health care who
provides emergency medical services or primary care to the patient
at the hospital, as applicable, reasonably believes that the patient:
(a) Is being treated for a life-threatening emergency;
(b) Has recently been offered or has been the subject of a test for
the human immunodeficiency virus or other sexually transmitted
diseases; or
(c) Lacks capacity to consent to such testing.
4. The Board shall adopt regulations to ensure that:
-
*SB397*

– 71 –
(a) Any test which is administered to a patient or for which a
patient is assisted in obtaining pursuant to this section is medically
indicated for that patient; and
(b) Communications concerning testing pursuant to this section
are made in a culturally competent manner and, to the extent
practicable, in a language that is easily understood by the patient.
5. A physician, naturopathic physician, physician assistant,
advanced practice registered nurse, midwife or hospital that fails to
comply with the provisions of this section:
(a) Is not subject to a criminal penalty or an administrative fine
pursuant to this chapter; and
(b) Is subject to disciplinary action, where applicable.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 101. NRS 442.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
442.003 As used in this chapter, unless the context requires
otherwise:
1. “Advisory Board” means the Advisory Board on Maternal
and Child Health.
2. “Department” means the Department of Health and Human
Services.
3. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
4. “Division” means the Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department.
5. “Fetal alcohol spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 432B.0655.
6. “Freestanding birthing center” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0065.
7. “Laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.040.
8. “Midwife” means:
(a) A person certified as:
(1) A Certified Professional Midwife by the North American
Registry of Midwives, or its successor organization; or
(2) A Certified Nurse-Midwife by the American Midwifery
Certification Board, or its successor organization; or
(b) Any other type of midwife.
9. “Provider of health care or other services” means:
(a) A clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed, or an
alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed or certified, pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS;
-
*SB397*

– 72 –
(b) A physician or a physician assistant who is licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS and who practices in the area of
obstetrics and gynecology, family practice, internal medicine,
pediatrics or psychiatry;
(c) A naturopathic physician;
(d) A licensed nurse;
[(d)] (e) A licensed psychologist;
[(e)] (f) A licensed marriage and family therapist;
[(f)] (g) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
[(g)] (h) A licensed social worker;
[(h)] (i) A licensed dietitian; or
[(i)] (j) The holder of a certificate of registration as a
pharmacist.
Sec. 102. NRS 453C.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
453C.030 1. “Health care professional” means a physician, a
physician assistant or an advanced practice registered nurse.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Advanced practice registered nurse” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 632.012.
(b) “Physician” means a physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
(c) “Physician assistant” means a physician assistant licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS.
Sec. 103. NRS 454.361 is hereby amended to read as follows:
454.361 A conviction of the violation of any of the provisions
of NRS 454.181 to 454.371, inclusive, constitutes grounds for the
suspension or revocation of any license issued to such person
pursuant to the provisions of chapters 630, 630A, 631, 633, 635,
636, 638, 639 or 653 of NRS.
Sec. 104. NRS 457.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
457.301 1. A primary care provider shall:
(a) Attempt to determine whether each adult woman to whom he
or she provides care has a personal or family history of breast,
ovarian, tubal or peritoneal cancer or an ancestry associated with a
harmful mutation in the BRCA gene or meets any other criteria
under which the United States Preventive Services Task Force has
recommended screening for a risk of such a mutation; and
(b) If the primary care provider determines that an adult woman
to whom he or she provides care meets the criteria described in
paragraph (a) and has not previously undergone genetic testing for a
harmful mutation in the BRCA gene, use an appropriate brief
familial risk assessment tool to screen for a risk of such a mutation.
-
*SB397*

– 73 –
2. If such a screening indicates that a woman is at risk of a
harmful mutation in the BRCA gene, the primary care provider
must:
(a) Provide the woman with written notice of the need to discuss
genetic counseling and testing with the provider;
(b) Provide genetic counseling to the woman or ensure that the
woman is referred for genetic counseling; and
(c) If a genetic test for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene is
clinically indicated as a result of the genetic counseling, administer
such a test to the woman or ensure that the woman is referred for
such testing.
3. A primary care provider who fails to comply with this
section is not subject to criminal penalties or professional discipline
for such failure to comply.
4. As used in this section, “primary care provider” means:
(a) A physician, physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS , a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS, or advanced practice registered nurse who
specializes in primary care, family medicine, internal medicine or
obstetrics and gynecology; or
(b) A midwife.
Sec. 105. NRS 686B.040 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Commissioner may by rule exempt any person or class of
persons or any market segment from any or all of the provisions of
NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive, if and to the extent that the
Commissioner finds their application unnecessary to achieve the
purposes of those sections.
2. The Commissioner may not, by rule or otherwise, exempt an
insurer from the provisions of NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799,
inclusive, with regard to insurance covering the liability of a
practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of
NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS for a breach of the practitioner’s professional duty
toward a patient.
Sec. 106. NRS 686B.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.070 1. Every authorized insurer and every rate service
organization licensed under NRS 686B.140 which has been
designated by any insurer for the filing of rates under subsection 2
of NRS 686B.090 shall file with the Commissioner all:
(a) Rates and proposed increases thereto;
(b) Forms of policies to which the rates apply;
(c) Supplementary rate information; and
-
*SB397*

– 74 –
(d) Changes and amendments thereof,
 made by it for use in this state.
2. A filing made pursuant to this section must include a
proposed effective date and must be filed not less than 30 days
before that proposed effective date, except that a filing for a
proposed increase or decrease in a rate may include a request that
the Commissioner authorize an effective date that is earlier than the
proposed effective date.
3. If an insurer makes a filing for a proposed increase in a rate
for insurance covering the liability of a practitioner licensed
pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a
naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS
for a breach of the practitioner’s professional duty toward a patient,
the insurer shall not include in the filing any component that is
directly or indirectly related to the following:
(a) Capital losses, diminished cash flow from any dividends,
interest or other investment returns, or any other financial loss that
is materially outside of the claims experience of the professional
liability insurance industry, as determined by the Commissioner.
(b) Losses that are the result of any criminal or fraudulent
activities of a director, officer or employee of the insurer.
 If the Commissioner determines that a filing includes any such
component, the Commissioner shall, pursuant to NRS 686B.110,
disapprove the proposed increase, in whole or in part, to the extent
that the proposed increase relies upon such a component.
4. If an insurer makes a filing for a proposed increase in a rate
for a health benefit plan, as that term is defined in NRS 687B.470,
the filing must include a unified rate review template, a written
description justifying the rate increase and any rate filing
documentation.
5. As used in this section, “rate filing documentation,” “unified
rate review template” and “written description justifying the rate
increase” have the meanings ascribed in 45 C.F.R. § 154.215.
Sec. 107. NRS 686B.115 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.115 1. Any hearing held by the Commissioner to
determine whether rates comply with the provisions of NRS
686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive, must be open to members of the
public.
2. All costs for transcripts prepared pursuant to such a hearing
must be paid by the insurer requesting the hearing.
3. At any hearing which is held by the Commissioner to
determine whether rates comply with the provisions of NRS
686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive, and which involves rates for
insurance covering the liability of a practitioner licensed pursuant to
-
*SB397*

– 75 –
chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS for a breach
of the practitioner’s professional duty toward a patient, if a person is
not otherwise authorized pursuant to this title to become a party to
the hearing by intervention, the person is entitled to provide
testimony at the hearing if, not later than 2 days before the date set
for the hearing, the person files with the Commissioner a written
statement which states:
(a) The name and title of the person;
(b) The interest of the person in the hearing; and
(c) A brief summary describing the purpose of the testimony the
person will offer at the hearing.
4. If a person provides testimony at a hearing in accordance
with subsection 3:
(a) The Commissioner may, if the Commissioner finds it
necessary to preserve order, prevent inordinate delay or protect the
rights of the parties at the hearing, place reasonable limitations on
the duration of the testimony and prohibit the person from providing
testimony that is not relevant to the issues raised at the hearing.
(b) The Commissioner shall consider all relevant testimony
provided by the person at the hearing in determining whether the
rates comply with the provisions of NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799,
inclusive.
Sec. 108. NRS 686B.117 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.117 If a filing made with the Commissioner pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 686B.070 pertains to
insurance covering the liability of a practitioner licensed pursuant
to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS for a breach
of the practitioner’s professional duty toward a patient, any
interested person, and any association of persons or organization
whose members may be affected, may intervene as a matter of right
in any hearing or other proceeding conducted to determine whether
the applicable rate or proposed increase thereto:
1. Complies with the standards set forth in NRS 686B.050 and
subsection 3 of NRS 686B.070.
2. Should be approved or disapproved.
Sec. 109. NRS 689A.035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.035 1. An insurer shall not charge a provider of health
care a fee to include the name of the provider on a list of providers
of health care given by the insurer to its insureds.
2. An insurer shall not contract with a provider of health care
to provide health care to an insured unless the insurer uses the form
-
*SB397*

– 76 –
prescribed by the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 629.095 to obtain
any information related to the credentials of the provider of health
care.
3. A contract between an insurer and a provider of health care
may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
insurer upon giving to the provider 45 days’ written notice of the
modification of the insurer’s schedule of payments, including any
changes to the fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If
the provider fails to object in writing to the modification within the
45-day period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that
period. If the provider objects in writing to the modification within
the 45-day period, the modification must not become effective
unless agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
4. If an insurer contracts with a provider of health care to
provide health care to an insured, the insurer shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 110. NRS 689A.04033 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.04033 1. A policy of health insurance must provide
coverage for medical treatment which a policyholder or subscriber
receives as part of a clinical trial or study if:
(a) The medical treatment is provided in a Phase I, Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial for the treatment of
cancer or in a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of chronic fatigue syndrome;
(b) The clinical trial or study is approved by:
(1) An agency of the National Institutes of Health as set forth
in 42 U.S.C. § 281(b);
(2) A cooperative group;
(3) The Food and Drug Administration as an application for
a new investigational drug;
-
*SB397*

– 77 –
(4) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(5) The United States Department of Defense;
(c) In the case of:
(1) A Phase I clinical trial or study for the treatment of
cancer, the medical treatment is provided at a facility authorized to
conduct Phase I clinical trials or studies for the treatment of cancer;
or
(2) A Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome, the medical
treatment is provided by a provider of health care and the facility
and personnel for the clinical trial or study have the experience and
training to provide the treatment in a capable manner;
(d) There is no medical treatment available which is considered
a more appropriate alternative medical treatment than the medical
treatment provided in the clinical trial or study;
(e) There is a reasonable expectation based on clinical data that
the medical treatment provided in the clinical trial or study will be at
least as effective as any other medical treatment;
(f) The clinical trial or study is conducted in this State; and
(g) The policyholder or subscriber has signed, before
participating in the clinical trial or study, a statement of consent
indicating that the policyholder or subscriber has been informed of,
without limitation:
(1) The procedure to be undertaken;
(2) Alternative methods of treatment; and
(3) The risks associated with participation in the clinical trial
or study, including, without limitation, the general nature and extent
of such risks.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the coverage
for medical treatment required by this section is limited to:
(a) Coverage for any drug or device that is approved for sale by
the Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the
approved drug or device has been approved for use in the medical
treatment of the policyholder or subscriber.
(b) The cost of any reasonably necessary health care services
that are required as a result of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study or as a result of
any complication arising out of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study, to the extent
that such health care services would otherwise be covered under the
policy of health insurance.
(c) The cost of any routine health care services that would
otherwise be covered under the policy of health insurance for a
policyholder or subscriber participating in a Phase I clinical trial or
study.
-
*SB397*

– 78 –
(d) The initial consultation to determine whether the
policyholder or subscriber is eligible to participate in the clinical
trial or study.
(e) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate
monitoring of the policyholder or subscriber during a Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study.
(f) Health care services which are required for the clinically
appropriate monitoring of the policyholder or subscriber during a
Phase I clinical trial or study and which are not directly related to
the clinical trial or study.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 689A.04036, the services
provided pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (e) and (f) must be covered
only if the services are provided by a provider with whom the
insurer has contracted for such services. If the insurer has not
contracted for the provision of such services, the insurer shall pay
the provider the rate of reimbursement that is paid to other providers
with whom the insurer has contracted for similar services and the
provider shall accept that rate of reimbursement as payment in full.
3. Particular medical treatment described in subsection 2 and
provided to a policyholder or subscriber is not required to be
covered pursuant to this section if that particular medical treatment
is provided by the sponsor of the clinical trial or study free of charge
to the policyholder or subscriber.
4. The coverage for medical treatment required by this section
does not include:
(a) Any portion of the clinical trial or study that is customarily
paid for by a government or a biotechnical, pharmaceutical or
medical industry.
(b) Coverage for a drug or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 which is paid for by the manufacturer, distributor or
provider of the drug or device.
(c) Health care services that are specifically excluded from
coverage under the policyholder’s or subscriber’s policy of health
insurance, regardless of whether such services are provided under
the clinical trial or study.
(d) Health care services that are customarily provided by the
sponsors of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the
participants in the trial or study.
(e) Extraneous expenses related to participation in the clinical
trial or study including, without limitation, travel, housing and other
expenses that a participant may incur.
(f) Any expenses incurred by a person who accompanies the
policyholder or subscriber during the clinical trial or study.
-
*SB397*

– 79 –
(g) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy a need
or desire for data collection or analysis that is not directly related to
the clinical management of the policyholder or subscriber.
(h) Any costs for the management of research relating to the
clinical trial or study.
5. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy of
health insurance specified in subsection 1 may require copies of the
approval or certification issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, the statement of consent signed by the policyholder or
subscriber, protocols for the clinical trial or study and any other
materials related to the scope of the clinical trial or study relevant to
the coverage of medical treatment pursuant to this section.
6. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy
specified in subsection 1 shall:
(a) Include in any disclosure of the coverage provided by the
policy notice to each policyholder and subscriber under the policy of
the availability of the benefits required by this section.
(b) Provide the coverage required by this section subject to the
same deductible, copayment, coinsurance and other such conditions
for coverage that are required under the policy.
7. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2006,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with this section is void.
8. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy
specified in subsection 1 is immune from liability for:
(a) Any injury to a policyholder or subscriber caused by:
(1) Any medical treatment provided to the policyholder or
subscriber in connection with his or her participation in a clinical
trial or study described in this section; or
(2) An act or omission by a provider of health care who
provides medical treatment or supervises the provision of medical
treatment to the policyholder or subscriber in connection with his or
her participation in a clinical trial or study described in this section.
(b) Any adverse or unanticipated outcome arising out of a
policyholder’s or subscriber’s participation in a clinical trial or study
described in this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cooperative group” means a network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and has established a peer review
program approved by the National Institutes of Health. The term
includes:
(1) The Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program; and
(2) The Community Clinical Oncology Program.
-
*SB397*

– 80 –
(b) “Facility authorized to conduct Phase I clinical trials or
studies for the treatment of cancer” means a facility or an affiliate of
a facility that:
(1) Has in place a Phase I program which permits only
selective participation in the program and which uses clear-cut
criteria to determine eligibility for participation in the program;
(2) Operates a protocol review and monitoring system which
conforms to the standards set forth in the “Policies and Guidelines
Relating to the Cancer Center Support Grant” published by the
Cancer Centers Branch of the National Cancer Institute;
(3) Employs at least two researchers and at least one of those
researchers receives funding from a federal grant;
(4) Employs at least three clinical investigators who have
experience working in Phase I clinical trials or studies conducted at
a facility designated as a comprehensive cancer center by the
National Cancer Institute;
(5) Possesses specialized resources for use in Phase I clinical
trials or studies, including, without limitation, equipment that
facilitates research and analysis in proteomics, genomics and
pharmacokinetics;
(6) Is capable of gathering, maintaining and reporting
electronic data; and
(7) Is capable of responding to audits instituted by federal
and state agencies.
(c) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A hospital; or
(2) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of
NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS.
Sec. 111. NRS 689B.015 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.015 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall not charge a provider of health care a fee to include
the name of the provider on a list of providers of health care given
by the insurer to its insureds.
2. An insurer specified in subsection 1 shall not contract with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an insured unless
the insurer uses the form prescribed by the Commissioner pursuant
to NRS 629.095 to obtain any information related to the credentials
of the provider of health care.
3. A contract between an insurer specified in subsection 1 and
a provider of health care may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
-
*SB397*

– 81 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
insurer upon giving to the provider 45 days’ written notice of the
modification of the insurer’s schedule of payments, including any
changes to the fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If
the provider fails to object in writing to the modification within the
45-day period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that
period. If the provider objects in writing to the modification within
the 45-day period, the modification must not become effective
unless agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
4. If an insurer specified in subsection 1 contracts with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an insured, the
insurer shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 112. NRS 689B.0306 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0306 1. A policy of group health insurance must
provide coverage for medical treatment which a person insured
under the group policy receives as part of a clinical trial or study if:
(a) The medical treatment is provided in a Phase I, Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial for the treatment of
cancer or in a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of chronic fatigue syndrome;
(b) The clinical trial or study is approved by:
(1) An agency of the National Institutes of Health as set forth
in 42 U.S.C. § 281(b);
(2) A cooperative group;
(3) The Food and Drug Administration as an application for
a new investigational drug;
(4) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(5) The United States Department of Defense;
(c) In the case of:
(1) A Phase I clinical trial or study for the treatment of
cancer, the medical treatment is provided at a facility authorized to
-
*SB397*

– 82 –
conduct Phase I clinical trials or studies for the treatment of cancer;
or
(2) A Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome, the medical
treatment is provided by a provider of health care and the facility
and personnel for the clinical trial or study have the experience and
training to provide the treatment in a capable manner;
(d) There is no medical treatment available which is considered
a more appropriate alternative medical treatment than the medical
treatment provided in the clinical trial or study;
(e) There is a reasonable expectation based on clinical data that
the medical treatment provided in the clinical trial or study will be at
least as effective as any other medical treatment;
(f) The clinical trial or study is conducted in this State; and
(g) The insured has signed, before participating in the clinical
trial or study, a statement of consent indicating that the insured has
been informed of, without limitation:
(1) The procedure to be undertaken;
(2) Alternative methods of treatment; and
(3) The risks associated with participation in the clinical trial
or study, including, without limitation, the general nature and extent
of such risks.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the coverage
for medical treatment required by this section is limited to:
(a) Coverage for any drug or device that is approved for sale by
the Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the
approved drug or device has been approved for use in the medical
treatment of the insured person.
(b) The cost of any reasonably necessary health care services
that are required as a result of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study or as a result of
any complication arising out of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study, to the extent
that such health care services would otherwise be covered under the
policy of group health insurance.
(c) The cost of any routine health care services that would
otherwise be covered under the policy of group health insurance for
an insured participating in a Phase I clinical trial or study.
(d) The initial consultation to determine whether the insured is
eligible to participate in the clinical trial or study.
(e) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate
monitoring of the insured during a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV
clinical trial or study.
(f) Health care services which are required for the clinically
appropriate monitoring of the insured during a Phase I clinical trial
-
*SB397*

– 83 –
or study and which are not directly related to the clinical trial or
study.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 689B.0303, the services
provided pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (e) and (f) must be covered
only if the services are provided by a provider with whom the
insurer has contracted for such services. If the insurer has not
contracted for the provision of such services, the insurer shall pay
the provider the rate of reimbursement that is paid to other providers
with whom the insurer has contracted for similar services and the
provider shall accept that rate of reimbursement as payment in full.
3. Particular medical treatment described in subsection 2 and
provided to a person insured under the group policy is not required
to be covered pursuant to this section if that particular medical
treatment is provided by the sponsor of the clinical trial or study free
of charge to the person insured under the group policy.
4. The coverage for medical treatment required by this section
does not include:
(a) Any portion of the clinical trial or study that is customarily
paid for by a government or a biotechnical, pharmaceutical or
medical industry.
(b) Coverage for a drug or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 which is paid for by the manufacturer, distributor or
provider of the drug or device.
(c) Health care services that are specifically excluded from
coverage under the insured’s policy of group health insurance,
regardless of whether such services are provided under the clinical
trial or study.
(d) Health care services that are customarily provided by the
sponsors of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the
participants in the trial or study.
(e) Extraneous expenses related to participation in the clinical
trial or study, including, without limitation, travel, housing and
other expenses that a participant may incur.
(f) Any expenses incurred by a person who accompanies the
insured during the clinical trial or study.
(g) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy a need
or desire for data collection or analysis that is not directly related to
the clinical management of the insured.
(h) Any costs for the management of research relating to the
clinical trial or study.
5. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy of
group health insurance specified in subsection 1 may require copies
of the approval or certification issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, the statement of consent signed by the insured,
protocols for the clinical trial or study and any other materials
-
*SB397*

– 84 –
related to the scope of the clinical trial or study relevant to the
coverage of medical treatment pursuant to this section.
6. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy of
group health insurance specified in subsection 1 shall:
(a) Include in any disclosure of the coverage provided by the
policy notice to each group policyholder of the availability of the
benefits required by this section.
(b) Provide the coverage required by this section subject to the
same deductible, copayment, coinsurance and other such conditions
for coverage that are required under the policy.
7. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, [2006,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with this section is void.
8. An insurer who delivers or issues for delivery a policy of
group health insurance specified in subsection 1 is immune from
liability for:
(a) Any injury to the insured caused by:
(1) Any medical treatment provided to the insured in
connection with his or her participation in a clinical trial or study
described in this section; or
(2) An act or omission by a provider of health care who
provides medical treatment or supervises the provision of medical
treatment to the insured in connection with his or her participation in
a clinical trial or study described in this section.
(b) Any adverse or unanticipated outcome arising out of an
insured’s participation in a clinical trial or study described in this
section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cooperative group” means a network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and has established a peer review
program approved by the National Institutes of Health. The term
includes:
(1) The Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program; and
(2) The Community Clinical Oncology Program.
(b) “Facility authorized to conduct Phase I clinical trials or
studies for the treatment of cancer” means a facility or an affiliate of
a facility that:
(1) Has in place a Phase I program which permits only
selective participation in the program and which uses clear-cut
criteria to determine eligibility for participation in the program;
(2) Operates a protocol review and monitoring system which
conforms to the standards set forth in the “Policies and Guidelines
-
*SB397*

– 85 –
Relating to the Cancer Center Support Grant” published by the
Cancer Centers Branch of the National Cancer Institute;
(3) Employs at least two researchers and at least one of those
researchers receives funding from a federal grant;
(4) Employs at least three clinical investigators who have
experience working in Phase I clinical trials or studies conducted at
a facility designated as a comprehensive cancer center by the
National Cancer Institute;
(5) Possesses specialized resources for use in Phase I clinical
trials or studies, including, without limitation, equipment that
facilitates research and analysis in proteomics, genomics and
pharmacokinetics;
(6) Is capable of gathering, maintaining and reporting
electronic data; and
(7) Is capable of responding to audits instituted by federal
and state agencies.
(c) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A hospital; or
(2) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of
NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 113. NRS 689C.131 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.131 1. A carrier serving small employers and a carrier
that offers a contract to a voluntary purchasing group shall not
charge a provider of health care a fee to include the name of the
provider on a list of providers of health care given by the carrier to
its insureds.
2. A carrier specified in subsection 1 shall not contract with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an insured unless
the carrier uses the form prescribed by the Commissioner pursuant
to NRS 629.095 to obtain any information related to the credentials
of the provider of health care.
3. A contract between a carrier specified in subsection 1 and a
provider of health care may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
carrier upon giving to the provider 45 days’ written notice of the
modification of the carrier’s schedule of payments, including any
changes to the fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If
the provider fails to object in writing to the modification within the
45 day period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that
period. If the provider objects in writing to the modification within
-
*SB397*

– 86 –
the 45 day period, the modification must not become effective
unless agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
4. If a carrier specified in subsection 1 contracts with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an insured, the
carrier shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 114. NRS 690B.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.270 If an insurer declines to issue to a practitioner
licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a
naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS
a policy of professional liability insurance, the insurer shall, upon
the request of the practitioner, disclose to the practitioner the
reasons the insurer declined to issue the policy.
Sec. 115. NRS 690B.280 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.280 If an insurer, for a policy of professional liability
insurance for a practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [,] or as a naturopathic physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS, sets the premium for the policy
for the practitioner at a rate that is higher than the standard rate of
the insurer for the applicable type of policy and specialty of the
practitioner, the insurer shall, upon the request of the practitioner,
disclose the reasons the insurer set the premium for the policy at the
higher rate.
Sec. 116. NRS 690B.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.290 If an insurer offers to issue a claims-made policy to a
practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of
NRS [,] or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS, the insurer shall:
1. Offer to issue an extended reporting endorsement to the
practitioner; and
-
*SB397*

– 87 –
2. Disclose to the practitioner the cost formula that the insurer
uses to determine the premium for the extended reporting
endorsement. The cost formula must be based on:
(a) An amount that is not more than twice the amount of the
premium for the claims-made policy at the time of the termination
of that policy; and
(b) The rates filed by the insurer and approved by the
Commissioner.
Sec. 117. NRS 690B.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
an insurer issues a policy of professional liability insurance to a
practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 632 or 633 of NRS or
as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of
NRS who delivers one or more babies per year, the insurer shall not
set the premium for the policy at a rate that is different from the rate
set for such a policy issued by the insurer to any other practitioner
licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a
naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS
who delivers one or more babies per year if the difference in rates is
based in whole or in part upon the number of babies delivered per
year by the practitioner.
2. If an insurer issues a policy of professional liability
insurance to a practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 632 or
633 of NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS who delivers one or more babies per year, the
insurer may set the premium for the policy at a rate that is different,
based in whole or in part upon the number of babies delivered per
year by the practitioner, from the rate set for such a policy issued by
the insurer to any other practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter
630, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS who delivers one or more babies
per year if the insurer:
(a) Bases the difference upon actuarial and loss experience data
available to the insurer; and
(b) Obtains the approval of the Commissioner for the difference
in rates.
3. The provisions of this section do not prohibit an insurer from
setting the premium for a policy of professional liability insurance
issued to a practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 632 or 633
of NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS who delivers one or more babies per year at a
rate that is different from the rate set for such a policy issued by the
insurer to any other practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630,
632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed
-
*SB397*

– 88 –
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS who delivers one or more babies
per year if the difference in rates is based solely upon factors other
than the number of babies delivered per year by the practitioner.
Sec. 118. NRS 690B.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.310 1. If an agreement settles a claim or action against
a practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of
NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS for a breach of his or her professional duty toward a
patient, the following terms of the agreement must not be made
confidential:
(a) The names of the parties;
(b) The date of the incidents or events giving rise to the claim or
action;
(c) The nature of the claim or action as set forth in the complaint
and the answer that is filed with the district court; and
(d) The effective date of the agreement.
2. Any provision of an agreement to settle a claim or action
that conflicts with this section is void.
Sec. 119. NRS 690B.330 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.330 1. In each rating plan of an insurer that issues a
policy of professional liability insurance to a practitioner licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS [,] or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS, the insurer
shall provide for a reduction in the premium for the policy if the
practitioner implements a qualified risk management system. The
amount of the reduction in the premium must be determined by the
Commissioner in accordance with the applicable standards for rates
established in NRS 686B.010 to 686B.1799, inclusive.
2. A qualified risk management system must comply with all
requirements established by the Commissioner.
3. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations to:
(a) Establish the requirements for a qualified risk management
system; and
(b) Carry out the provisions of this section.
4. The provisions of this section apply to all rating plans which
an insurer that issues a policy of professional liability insurance to a
practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS or as a
naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS
files with the Commissioner on and after the effective date of the
regulations adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this section.
-
*SB397*

– 89 –
Sec. 120. NRS 690B.350 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.350 1. The requirements of this section apply only if,
after a hearing convened at the discretion of the Commissioner, the
Commissioner determines that the market for professional liability
insurance issued to any class, type or specialty of practitioner
licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of NRS or as a
naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS
is not competitive and that such insurance is unavailable or
unaffordable for a substantial number of such practitioners.
2. If the Commissioner convenes a hearing pursuant to
subsection 1 and issues a finding that the market for professional
liability insurance issued to any class, type or specialty of
practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of NRS or
as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of
NRS is not competitive, the Commissioner may designate that class,
type or specialty of practitioner to be an essential medical specialty.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an insurer
intends to cancel, terminate or otherwise not renew all policies of
professional liability insurance that it has issued to any class, type or
specialty of practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633
of NRS [,] or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS, the insurer must provide 120 days’ notice of
its intended action to the Commissioner and the practitioners before
its intended action becomes effective.
4. If an insurer intends to cancel, terminate or otherwise not
renew a specific policy of professional liability insurance that it has
issued to a practitioner who is practicing in one or more of the
essential medical specialties designated by the Commissioner:
(a) The insurer must provide 120 days’ notice to the practitioner
before its intended action becomes effective; and
(b) The Commissioner may require the insurer to delay its
intended action for a period of not more than 60 days if the
Commissioner determines that a replacement policy is not readily
available to the practitioner.
5. If an insurer intends to cancel, terminate or otherwise not
renew all policies of professional liability insurance that it has
issued to practitioners who are practicing in one or more of the
essential medical specialties designated by the Commissioner:
(a) The insurer must provide 120 days’ notice of its intended
action to the Commissioner and the practitioners before its intended
action becomes effective; and
(b) The Commissioner may require the insurer to delay its
intended action for a period of not more than 60 days if the
-
*SB397*

– 90 –
Commissioner determines that replacement policies are not readily
available to the practitioners.
6. The Commissioner may adopt any regulations that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 121. NRS 690B.360 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690B.360 1. The Commissioner may collect all information
which is pertinent to monitoring whether an insurer that issues
professional liability insurance for a practitioner licensed pursuant
to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS is complying
with the applicable standards for rates established in NRS 686B.010
to 686B.1799, inclusive. Such information may include, without
limitation:
(a) The amount of gross premiums collected with regard to each
medical specialty;
(b) Information relating to loss ratios; and
(c) Information reported pursuant to NRS 679B.430 and
679B.440.
2. In addition to the information collected pursuant to
subsection 1, the Commissioner may request any additional
information from an insurer:
(a) Whose rates and credit utilization are materially different
from other insurers in the market for professional liability insurance
for a practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633
of NRS or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS in this State;
(b) Whose credit utilization shows a substantial change from the
previous year; or
(c) Whose information collected pursuant to subsection 1
indicates a potentially adverse trend.
3. If the Commissioner requests additional information from an
insurer pursuant to subsection 2, the Commissioner may:
(a) Determine whether the additional information offers a
reasonable explanation for the results described in paragraph (a), (b)
or (c) of subsection 2; and
(b) Take any steps permitted by law that are necessary and
appropriate to assure the ongoing stability of the market for
professional liability insurance for a practitioner licensed pursuant
to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS in this State.
4. On an ongoing basis, the Commissioner may analyze and
evaluate the information collected pursuant to this section to
determine trends in and measure the health of the market for
professional liability insurance for a practitioner licensed pursuant
-
*SB397*

– 91 –
to chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of NRS or as a naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS in this State.
5. If the Commissioner convenes a hearing pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 690B.350 and determines that the market for
professional liability insurance issued to any class, type or specialty
of practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of NRS
or as a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630A
of NRS is not competitive and that such insurance is unavailable or
unaffordable for a substantial number of such practitioners, the
Commissioner shall prepare and submit a report of the
Commissioner’s findings and recommendations to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to members of the
Legislature.
Sec. 122. NRS 695A.095 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.095 1. A society shall not charge a provider of health
care a fee to include the name of the provider on a list of providers
of health care given by the society to its insureds.
2. A society shall not contract with a provider of health care to
provide health care to an insured unless the society uses the form
prescribed by the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 629.095 to obtain
any information related to the credentials of the provider of health
care.
3. A contract between a society and a provider of health care
may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
society upon giving to the provider 45 days’ written notice of the
modification of the society’s schedule of payments, including any
changes to the fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If
the provider fails to object in writing to the modification within the
45-day period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that
period. If the provider objects in writing to the modification within
the 45-day period, the modification must not become effective
unless agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
4. If a society contracts with a provider of health care to
provide health care to an insured, the society shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
-
*SB397*

– 92 –
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 123. NRS 695B.035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.035 1. A corporation subject to the provisions of this
chapter shall not charge a provider of health care a fee to include the
name of the provider on a list of providers of health care given by
the corporation to its insureds.
2. A corporation specified in subsection 1 shall not contract
with a provider of health care to provide health care to an insured
unless the corporation uses the form prescribed by the
Commissioner pursuant to NRS 629.095 to obtain any information
related to the credentials of the provider of health care.
3. A contract between a corporation specified in subsection 1
and a provider of health care may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
corporation upon giving to the provider 45 days’ written notice of
the modification of the corporation’s schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice. If the provider fails to object in writing to the
modification within the 45-day period, the modification becomes
effective at the end of that period. If the provider objects in writing
to the modification within the 45-day period, the modification must
not become effective unless agreed to by both parties as described in
paragraph (a).
4. If a corporation specified in subsection 1 contracts with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an insured, the
corporation shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
-
*SB397*

– 93 –
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 124. NRS 695B.1903 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1903 1. A policy of health insurance issued by a
medical services corporation must provide coverage for medical
treatment which a person insured under the policy receives as part of
a clinical trial or study if:
(a) The medical treatment is provided in a Phase I, Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial for the treatment of
cancer or in a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of chronic fatigue syndrome;
(b) The clinical trial or study is approved by:
(1) An agency of the National Institutes of Health as set forth
in 42 U.S.C. § 281(b);
(2) A cooperative group;
(3) The Food and Drug Administration as an application for
a new investigational drug;
(4) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(5) The United States Department of Defense;
(c) In the case of:
(1) A Phase I clinical trial or study for the treatment of
cancer, the medical treatment is provided at a facility authorized to
conduct Phase I clinical trials or studies for the treatment of cancer;
or
(2) A Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome, the medical
treatment is provided by a provider of health care and the facility
and personnel for the clinical trial or study have the experience and
training to provide the treatment in a capable manner;
(d) There is no medical treatment available which is considered
a more appropriate alternative medical treatment than the medical
treatment provided in the clinical trial or study;
(e) There is a reasonable expectation based on clinical data that
the medical treatment provided in the clinical trial or study will be at
least as effective as any other medical treatment;
(f) The clinical trial or study is conducted in this State; and
(g) The insured has signed, before participating in the clinical
trial or study, a statement of consent indicating that the insured has
been informed of, without limitation:
(1) The procedure to be undertaken;
(2) Alternative methods of treatment; and
(3) The risks associated with participation in the clinical trial
or study, including, without limitation, the general nature and extent
of such risks.
-
*SB397*

– 94 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the coverage
for medical treatment required by this section is limited to:
(a) Coverage for any drug or device that is approved for sale by
the Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the
approved drug or device has been approved for use in the medical
treatment of the insured person.
(b) The cost of any reasonably necessary health care services
that are required as a result of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study or as a result of
any complication arising out of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study, to the extent
that such health care services would otherwise be covered under the
policy of health insurance.
(c) The cost of any routine health care services that would
otherwise be covered under the policy of health insurance for an
insured participating in a Phase I clinical trial or study.
(d) The initial consultation to determine whether the insured is
eligible to participate in the clinical trial or study.
(e) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate
monitoring of the insured during a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV
clinical trial or study.
(f) Health care services which are required for the clinically
appropriate monitoring of the insured during a Phase I clinical trial
or study and which are not directly related to the clinical trial or
study.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 695B.1901, the services
provided pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (e) and (f) must be covered
only if the services are provided by a provider with whom the
medical services corporation has contracted for such services. If the
medical services corporation has not contracted for the provision of
such services, the medical services corporation shall pay the
provider the rate of reimbursement that is paid to other providers
with whom the medical services corporation has contracted for
similar services and the provider shall accept that rate of
reimbursement as payment in full.
3. Particular medical treatment described in subsection 2 and
provided to a person insured under the policy is not required to be
covered pursuant to this section if that particular medical treatment
is provided by the sponsor of the clinical trial or study free of charge
to the person insured under the policy.
4. The coverage for medical treatment required by this section
does not include:
(a) Any portion of the clinical trial or study that is customarily
paid for by a government or a biotechnical, pharmaceutical or
medical industry.
-
*SB397*

– 95 –
(b) Coverage for a drug or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 which is paid for by the manufacturer, distributor or
provider of the drug or device.
(c) Health care services that are specifically excluded from
coverage under the insured’s policy of health insurance, regardless
of whether such services are provided under the clinical trial or
study.
(d) Health care services that are customarily provided by the
sponsors of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the
participants in the trial or study.
(e) Extraneous expenses related to participation in the clinical
trial or study, including, without limitation, travel, housing and
other expenses that a participant may incur.
(f) Any expenses incurred by a person who accompanies the
insured during the trial or study.
(g) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy a need
or desire for data collection or analysis that is not directly related to
the clinical management of the insured.
(h) Any costs for the management of research relating to the
clinical trial or study.
5. A medical services corporation that delivers or issues for
delivery a policy of health insurance specified in subsection 1 may
require copies of the approval or certification issued pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the statement of consent signed by the
insured, protocols for the clinical trial or study and any other
materials related to the scope of the clinical trial or study relevant to
the coverage of medical treatment pursuant to this section.
6. A medical services corporation that delivers or issues for
delivery a policy of health insurance specified in subsection 1 shall:
(a) Include in any disclosure of the coverage provided by the
policy notice to each person insured under the policy of the
availability of the benefits required by this section.
(b) Provide the coverage required by this section subject to the
same deductible, copayment, coinsurance and other such conditions
for coverage that are required under the policy.
7. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2006,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with this section is void.
8. A medical services corporation that delivers or issues for
delivery a policy of health insurance specified in subsection 1 is
immune from liability for:
(a) Any injury to the insured caused by:
-
*SB397*

– 96 –
(1) Any medical treatment provided to the insured in
connection with his or her participation in a clinical trial or study
described in this section; or
(2) An act or omission by a provider of health care who
provides medical treatment or supervises the provision of medical
treatment to the insured in connection with his or her participation in
a clinical trial or study described in this section.
(b) Any adverse or unanticipated outcome arising out of an
insured’s participation in a clinical trial or study described in this
section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cooperative group” means a network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and has established a peer review
program approved by the National Institutes of Health. The term
includes:
(1) The Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program; and
(2) The Community Clinical Oncology Program.
(b) “Facility authorized to conduct Phase I clinical trials or
studies for the treatment of cancer” means a facility or an affiliate of
a facility that:
(1) Has in place a Phase I program which permits only
selective participation in the program and which uses clear-cut
criteria to determine eligibility for participation in the program;
(2) Operates a protocol review and monitoring system which
conforms to the standards set forth in the “Policies and Guidelines
Relating to the Cancer Center Support Grant” published by the
Cancer Centers Branch of the National Cancer Institute;
(3) Employs at least two researchers and at least one of those
researchers receives funding from a federal grant;
(4) Employs at least three clinical investigators who have
experience working in Phase I clinical trials or studies conducted at
a facility designated as a comprehensive cancer center by the
National Cancer Institute;
(5) Possesses specialized resources for use in Phase I clinical
trials or studies, including, without limitation, equipment that
facilitates research and analysis in proteomics, genomics and
pharmacokinetics;
(6) Is capable of gathering, maintaining and reporting
electronic data; and
(7) Is capable of responding to audits instituted by federal
and state agencies.
(c) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A hospital; or
-
*SB397*

– 97 –
(2) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of
NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630A of NRS.
Sec. 125. NRS 695C.125 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.125 1. A health maintenance organization shall not
contract with a provider of health care to provide health care to an
insured unless the health maintenance organization uses the form
prescribed by the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 629.095 to obtain
any information related to the credentials of the provider of health
care.
2. A contract between a health maintenance organization and a
provider of health care may be modified:
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the health
maintenance organization upon giving to the provider 45 days’
written notice of the modification of the health maintenance
organization’s schedule of payments, including any changes to the
fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If the provider
fails to object in writing to the modification within the 45-day
period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that period.
If the provider objects in writing to the modification within the 45-
day period, the modification must not become effective unless
agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
3. If a health maintenance organization contracts with a
provider of health care to provide health care to an enrollee, the
health maintenance organization shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 126. NRS 695C.1693 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1693 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
695C.050, a health care plan issued by a health maintenance
-
*SB397*

– 98 –
organization must provide coverage for medical treatment which an
enrollee receives as part of a clinical trial or study if:
(a) The medical treatment is provided in a Phase I, Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial for the treatment of
cancer or in a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of chronic fatigue syndrome;
(b) The clinical trial or study is approved by:
(1) An agency of the National Institutes of Health as set forth
in 42 U.S.C. § 281(b);
(2) A cooperative group;
(3) The Food and Drug Administration as an application for
a new investigational drug;
(4) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(5) The United States Department of Defense;
(c) In the case of:
(1) A Phase I clinical trial or study for the treatment of
cancer, the medical treatment is provided at a facility authorized to
conduct Phase I clinical trials or studies for the treatment of cancer;
or
(2) A Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome, the medical
treatment is provided by a provider of health care and the facility
and personnel for the clinical trial or study have the experience and
training to provide the treatment in a capable manner;
(d) There is no medical treatment available which is considered
a more appropriate alternative medical treatment than the medical
treatment provided in the clinical trial or study;
(e) There is a reasonable expectation based on clinical data that
the medical treatment provided in the clinical trial or study will be at
least as effective as any other medical treatment;
(f) The clinical trial or study is conducted in this State; and
(g) The enrollee has signed, before participating in the clinical
trial or study, a statement of consent indicating that the enrollee has
been informed of, without limitation:
(1) The procedure to be undertaken;
(2) Alternative methods of treatment; and
(3) The risks associated with participation in the clinical trial
or study, including, without limitation, the general nature and extent
of such risks.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the coverage
for medical treatment required by this section is limited to:
(a) Coverage for any drug or device that is approved for sale by
the Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the
approved drug or device has been approved for use in the medical
treatment of the enrollee.
-
*SB397*

– 99 –
(b) The cost of any reasonably necessary health care services
that are required as a result of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study or as a result of
any complication arising out of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study, to the extent
that such health care services would otherwise be covered under the
health care plan.
(c) The cost of any routine health care services that would
otherwise be covered under the health care plan for an enrollee in a
Phase I clinical trial or study.
(d) The initial consultation to determine whether the enrollee is
eligible to participate in the clinical trial or study.
(e) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate
monitoring of the enrollee during a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV
clinical trial or study.
(f) Health care services which are required for the clinically
appropriate monitoring of the enrollee during a Phase I clinical trial
or study and which are not directly related to the clinical trial or
study.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 695C.1691, the services
provided pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (e) and (f) must be covered
only if the services are provided by a provider with whom the health
maintenance organization has contracted for such services. If the
health maintenance organization has not contracted for the provision
of such services, the health maintenance organization shall pay the
provider the rate of reimbursement that is paid to other providers
with whom the health maintenance organization has contracted for
similar services and the provider shall accept that rate of
reimbursement as payment in full.
3. Particular medical treatment described in subsection 2 and
provided to an enrollee is not required to be covered pursuant to this
section if that particular medical treatment is provided by the
sponsor of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the enrollee.
4. The coverage for medical treatment required by this section
does not include:
(a) Any portion of the clinical trial or study that is customarily
paid for by a government or a biotechnical, pharmaceutical or
medical industry.
(b) Coverage for a drug or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 which is paid for by the manufacturer, distributor or
provider of the drug or device.
(c) Health care services that are specifically excluded from
coverage under the enrollee’s health care plan, regardless of whether
such services are provided under the clinical trial or study.
-
*SB397*

– 100 –
(d) Health care services that are customarily provided by the
sponsors of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the
participants in the trial or study.
(e) Extraneous expenses related to participation in the clinical
trial or study, including, without limitation, travel, housing and
other expenses that a participant may incur.
(f) Any expenses incurred by a person who accompanies the
enrollee during the clinical trial or study.
(g) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy a need
or desire for data collection or analysis that is not directly related to
the clinical management of the enrollee.
(h) Any costs for the management of research relating to the
clinical trial or study.
5. A health maintenance organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 may require
copies of the approval or certification issued pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 1, the statement of consent signed by the enrollee,
protocols for the clinical trial or study and any other materials
related to the scope of the clinical trial or study relevant to the
coverage of medical treatment pursuant to this section.
6. A health maintenance organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 shall provide
the coverage required by this section subject to the same deductible,
copayment, coinsurance and other such conditions for coverage that
are required under the plan.
7. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2006,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with this section is void.
8. A health maintenance organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 is immune from
liability for:
(a) Any injury to an enrollee caused by:
(1) Any medical treatment provided to the enrollee in
connection with his or her participation in a clinical trial or study
described in this section; or
(2) An act or omission by a provider of health care who
provides medical treatment or supervises the provision of medical
treatment to the enrollee in connection with his or her participation
in a clinical trial or study described in this section.
(b) Any adverse or unanticipated outcome arising out of an
enrollee’s participation in a clinical trial or study described in this
section.
9. As used in this section:
-
*SB397*

– 101 –
(a) “Cooperative group” means a network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and has established a peer review
program approved by the National Institutes of Health. The term
includes:
(1) The Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program; and
(2) The Community Clinical Oncology Program.
(b) “Facility authorized to conduct Phase I clinical trials or
studies for the treatment of cancer” means a facility or an affiliate of
a facility that:
(1) Has in place a Phase I program which permits only
selective participation in the program and which uses clear-cut
criteria to determine eligibility for participation in the program;
(2) Operates a protocol review and monitoring system which
conforms to the standards set forth in the “Policies and Guidelines
Relating to the Cancer Center Support Grant” published by the
Cancer Centers Branch of the National Cancer Institute;
(3) Employs at least two researchers and at least one of those
researchers receives funding from a federal grant;
(4) Employs at least three clinical investigators who have
experience working in Phase I clinical trials or studies conducted at
a facility designated as a comprehensive cancer center by the
National Cancer Institute;
(5) Possesses specialized resources for use in Phase I clinical
trials or studies, including, without limitation, equipment that
facilitates research and analysis in proteomics, genomics and
pharmacokinetics;
(6) Is capable of gathering, maintaining and reporting
electronic data; and
(7) Is capable of responding to audits instituted by federal
and state agencies.
(c) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A hospital; or
(2) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of
NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 127. NRS 695G.127 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.127 1. A managed care organization shall not contract
with a provider of health care to provide health care to an insured
unless the managed care organization uses the form prescribed by
the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 629.095 to obtain any
information related to the credentials of the provider of health care.
2. A contract between a managed care organization and a
provider of health care may be modified:
-
*SB397*

– 102 –
(a) At any time pursuant to a written agreement executed by
both parties.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by the
managed care organization upon giving to the provider 45 days’
written notice of the modification of the managed care
organization’s schedule of payments, including any changes to the
fee schedule applicable to the provider’s practice. If the provider
fails to object in writing to the modification within the 45-day
period, the modification becomes effective at the end of that period.
If the provider objects in writing to the modification within the 45-
day period, the modification must not become effective unless
agreed to by both parties as described in paragraph (a).
3. If a managed care organization contracts with a provider of
health care to provide health care services pursuant to chapter 689A,
689B, 689C, 695A, 695B or 695C of NRS, the managed care
organization shall:
(a) If requested by the provider of health care at the time the
contract is made, submit to the provider of health care the schedule
of payments applicable to the provider of health care; or
(b) If requested by the provider of health care at any other time,
submit to the provider of health care the schedule of payments,
including any changes to the fee schedule applicable to the
provider’s practice, specified in paragraph (a) within 7 days after
receiving the request.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” means a
provider of health care who is licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631,
632 or 633 of NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 128. NRS 695G.173 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.173 1. A health care plan issued by a managed care
organization must provide coverage for medical treatment which a
person insured under the plan receives as part of a clinical trial or
study if:
(a) The medical treatment is provided in a Phase I, Phase II,
Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial for the treatment of
cancer or in a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of chronic fatigue syndrome;
(b) The clinical trial or study is approved by:
(1) An agency of the National Institutes of Health as set forth
in 42 U.S.C. § 281(b);
(2) A cooperative group;
(3) The Food and Drug Administration as an application for
a new investigational drug;
(4) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
-
*SB397*

– 103 –
(5) The United States Department of Defense;
(c) In the case of:
(1) A Phase I clinical trial or study for the treatment of
cancer, the medical treatment is provided at a facility authorized to
conduct Phase I clinical trials or studies for the treatment of cancer;
or
(2) A Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV study or clinical trial
for the treatment of cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome, the medical
treatment is provided by a provider of health care and the facility
and personnel for the clinical trial or study have the experience and
training to provide the treatment in a capable manner;
(d) There is no medical treatment available which is considered
a more appropriate alternative medical treatment than the medical
treatment provided in the clinical trial or study;
(e) There is a reasonable expectation based on clinical data that
the medical treatment provided in the clinical trial or study will be at
least as effective as any other medical treatment;
(f) The clinical trial or study is conducted in this State; and
(g) The insured has signed, before participating in the clinical
trial or study, a statement of consent indicating that the insured has
been informed of, without limitation:
(1) The procedure to be undertaken;
(2) Alternative methods of treatment; and
(3) The risks associated with participation in the clinical trial
or study, including, without limitation, the general nature and extent
of such risks.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the coverage
for medical treatment required by this section is limited to:
(a) Coverage for any drug or device that is approved for sale by
the Food and Drug Administration without regard to whether the
approved drug or device has been approved for use in the medical
treatment of the insured.
(b) The cost of any reasonably necessary health care services
that are required as a result of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study or as a result of
any complication arising out of the medical treatment provided in a
Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV clinical trial or study, to the extent
that such health care services would otherwise be covered under the
health care plan.
(c) The cost of any routine health care services that would
otherwise be covered under the health care plan for an insured in a
Phase I clinical trial or study.
(d) The initial consultation to determine whether the insured is
eligible to participate in the clinical trial or study.
-
*SB397*

– 104 –
(e) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate
monitoring of the insured during a Phase II, Phase III or Phase IV
clinical trial or study.
(f) Health care services which are required for the clinically
appropriate monitoring of the insured during a Phase I clinical trial
or study and which are not directly related to the clinical trial or
study.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 695G.164, the services
provided pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (e) and (f) must be covered
only if the services are provided by a provider with whom the
managed care organization has contracted for such services. If the
managed care organization has not contracted for the provision of
such services, the managed care organization shall pay the provider
the rate of reimbursement that is paid to other providers with whom
the managed care organization has contracted for similar services
and the provider shall accept that rate of reimbursement as payment
in full.
3. Particular medical treatment described in subsection 2 and
provided to a person insured under the plan is not required to be
covered pursuant to this section if that particular medical treatment
is provided by the sponsor of the clinical trial or study free of charge
to the person insured under the plan.
4. The coverage for medical treatment required by this section
does not include:
(a) Any portion of the clinical trial or study that is customarily
paid for by a government or a biotechnical, pharmaceutical or
medical industry.
(b) Coverage for a drug or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 which is paid for by the manufacturer, distributor or
provider of the drug or device.
(c) Health care services that are specifically excluded from
coverage under the insured’s health care plan, regardless of whether
such services are provided under the clinical trial or study.
(d) Health care services that are customarily provided by the
sponsors of the clinical trial or study free of charge to the
participants in the trial or study.
(e) Extraneous expenses related to participation in the clinical
trial or study, including, without limitation, travel, housing and
other expenses that a participant may incur.
(f) Any expenses incurred by a person who accompanies the
insured during the clinical trial or study.
(g) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy a need
or desire for data collection or analysis that is not directly related to
the clinical management of the insured.
-
*SB397*

– 105 –
(h) Any costs for the management of research relating to the
clinical trial or study.
5. A managed care organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 may require
copies of the approval or certification issued pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 1, the statement of consent signed by the insured,
protocols for the clinical trial or study and any other materials
related to the scope of the clinical trial or study relevant to the
coverage of medical treatment pursuant to this section.
6. A managed care organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 shall provide
the coverage required by this section subject to the same deductible,
copayment, coinsurance and other such conditions for coverage that
are required under the plan.
7. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2006,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with this section is void.
8. A managed care organization that delivers or issues for
delivery a health care plan specified in subsection 1 is immune from
liability for:
(a) Any injury to an insured caused by:
(1) Any medical treatment provided to the insured in
connection with his or her participation in a clinical trial or study
described in this section; or
(2) An act or omission by a provider of health care who
provides medical treatment or supervises the provision of medical
treatment to the insured in connection with his or her participation in
a clinical trial or study described in this section.
(b) Any adverse or unanticipated outcome arising out of an
insured’s participation in a clinical trial or study described in this
section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cooperative group” means a network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and has established a peer review
program approved by the National Institutes of Health. The term
includes:
(1) The Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program; and
(2) The Community Clinical Oncology Program.
(b) “Facility authorized to conduct Phase I clinical trials or
studies for the treatment of cancer” means a facility or an affiliate of
a facility that:
-
*SB397*

– 106 –
(1) Has in place a Phase I program which permits only
selective participation in the program and which uses clear-cut
criteria to determine eligibility for participation in the program;
(2) Operates a protocol review and monitoring system which
conforms to the standards set forth in the “Policies and Guidelines
Relating to the Cancer Center Support Grant” published by the
Cancer Centers Branch of the National Cancer Institute;
(3) Employs at least two researchers and at least one of those
researchers receives funding from a federal grant;
(4) Employs at least three clinical investigators who have
experience working in Phase I clinical trials or studies conducted at
a facility designated as a comprehensive cancer center by the
National Cancer Institute;
(5) Possesses specialized resources for use in Phase I clinical
trials or studies, including, without limitation, equipment that
facilitates research and analysis in proteomics, genomics and
pharmacokinetics;
(6) Is capable of gathering, maintaining and reporting
electronic data; and
(7) Is capable of responding to audits instituted by federal
and state agencies.
(c) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A hospital; or
(2) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 631 or 633 of
NRS [.] or a naturopathic physician who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 630A of NRS.
Sec. 129. 1. As soon as practicable on or after July 1, 2025,
the Governor shall appoint to the Nevada Board of Homeopathic
and Naturopathic Medical Examiners created by NRS 630A.100, as
amended by section 40 of this act:
(a) One new member described in subsection 2 of NRS
630A.110, as amended by section 41 of this act, to an initial term
that expires on June 30, 2027; and
(b) One new member described in subsection 2 of NRS
630A.110, as amended by section 41 of this act, to an initial term
that expires on June 30, 2029.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of NRS
630A.110, as amended by section 41 of this act, the initial members
described in that subsection who are appointed to the Nevada Board
of Homeopathic and Naturopathic Medical Examiners pursuant to
subsection 1 may be persons who are licensed to practice
naturopathic medicine in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States, have been engaged in the practice of
naturopathic medicine in that jurisdiction for a period of more than
-
*SB397*

– 107 –
2 years preceding their respective appointments and are actually
engaged in the practice of naturopathic medicine.
Sec. 130. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 33, 40, 41, 96 and 129 of this act become effective
on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 1 to 32, inclusive, 34 to 39, inclusive, 42 to 95,
inclusive, and 97 to 128, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB397*